That's the best defense he can come up with?
Voices of descent
&gt;Let him ride it out Who are you suggesting this to? When it comes down to it, unless he is impeached (which is almost certainly not going to happen), the only person who has an actual say in whether to "let him ride it out" or not is the Senator himself.
Very cool! Just wish there were more airports to take off from. Seeing something like NYC or Chicago would be pretty interesting (without having to fly for a substantial amount of time).
Oh no, its quite convenient actually.  Its much easier to clean; you're spic-n-span with a single swipe!
Apple's users are in a walled-garden, and Apple is trying to demand total control, with only Apple's interests preserved.
It *is* possible.  There are a couple of presidents who policies were hated ( I want to say Truman, Ike, or FDR ) and left with very low marks but history shows them in a much better light because we can now see the effects.
Well let us know when you do that.  And be sure to include whether they chose Islam like in the US where it isn't enforced in a draconian measure, or if they chose the government enforced version like they have in Iran and Saudi Arabia.
We have a Peets here on 3rd floor, fuel for the Science.
Why TF has this to be in Flash? Very annoying.
Which is the west. I can find several videos of hostage takers in the U.S. getting sniped.
Well, disagreeing with an article simply because of its source its a genetic fallacy. As for its criticism, where does it err? Or will you let me pick?:)
It would be cool if you could copy text directly from the PDF/PS/DVI and put it into another buffer. As it stands, I think this is only useful for people who use text based tools to generate PDF/PS/DVI output.
Can't sleep, squid will eat me ...
&gt;These people who defend the culture couldn't possibly think of a veiled woman as having been TOLD to wear it (and told to tell infidels it's her "choice"). It does not fit within the ideological framework that they live in
God's intelligent design.
China's law enforcement system strikes hard and fast ... the negatives have been discussed here already, but the positives are that in general, China is very safe for the average person from crime/violence. (Coincidence? The biggest exception are the border towns near Hong Kong.) They've just traded an increase in the amount of innocent people being punished(/killed) in exchange for (greatly) increased levels of safety from crime for the average person.  In the U.S., people have traded a decreased chance that an innocent person will be punished(/killed) for a crime he didn't commit in exchange for increased levels of violent crime. I'm not advocating either side, I'm just saying that looking at the two sides of the spectrum that the U.S. and China are on, the actual results are almost textbook.
Oops, I thought I'd spelt it wrong, hangs head in shame.
That kind of stuff happens all the time and usually is corrected. Sometimes they tweak filters and you block sites unintentionally. They just need to lobby the military to let them back in. It happened to WND recently as well. Time will tell...
I take it you are not affected by this trend?
I read somewhere (can't find it now) that we really only have 1 billion left before it gets too hot.
Yeah, that was poorly worded.
'97 RedHat  x86  '98 Suse    x86  '00 Suse    PPC  '01 Debian  PPC  '02 Debian  x86  ...  '07 Debian  x86 Basically I used RedHat until they turned into M$, SuSE until they turned into RedHat.  Debian because I want to be free. No more commercial vendors for me.   
Property tax of 1641 on a $1500 house :(
1) Your URL is spelled wrong,  tribien should be spelled TrayBee'en...it's french ...LOL jk...keep submitting, make sure your content is fresh don't linkjack...the reddit gods hate linkjacking
I am aware of the wealth of information debunking them.  I'm also aware of the questions that I and others like the many, many people from this link still have.   My point is that I can see a powerful government either ignoring an attack like this to further their political/ideological/monetary agenda easily.  It's a prime motive.  When the Vice-President used to be the C.E.O. of Haliburton, a major player in the military industrial complex and company that has profited billions as result of the attacks, it's easy to understand why they would let something like this happen or direct it themselves.   Behind every government is a group of men.  Men are not infallible.  Especially powerful ones.  We've all heard the term absolute power corrupts absolutely - and that's what it feels like now.  People getting throwin in jail for blowing the whistle about corruption in Iraq, protesters getting jailed for waving impeach signs around, illegal wiretapping on our phones, the books you check out at the library can be tracked now to possibly place you in a group suspect of "terrorist action".   When the History Channel aired its documentary it was completely biased.  It's not hard to see why when you find out The History Channel is part of the A&amp;E Television Network which is jointly owned by The Walt Disney Company (37.5%), The Hearst Corporation (37.5%), and NBC Universal (25%). NBC Universal is run by General Electric, the world's second largest corporation and one of the major players within the military industrial complex.   So the people who have something to lose by displaying unbiased information were responsible for conveying a message about that which could hurt them. It is relevant to human existence, because as stated earlier, it would not only expose what type of leaders we really have but send a message to the American people that to actively prevent something like this from occurring again they have to do just - be active.  Active in their local community, active in their state legislature and active in the decisions the federal government makes.  They would have to speak up and empower themselves to put a stop to the corruption in Washington.   All these people are asking for is a second investigation.  If there is nothing to hide then the government has nothing to worry about. 
Well, if by "kind" he means there will be few direct comparisons to King John, George III, Andrew Jackson, or Ulysses S Grant...  sure.  It'll be kind. 
Did you reply to the right post?
surely that's gotta be dangerous?
Joke approved.
&gt; Any of you feel an increased rate of morbidity? I'm speechless.  Morbidity rate is an emergent metric of disease incidence -- you know this, right?  Having a single individual ''measure'' morbidity is absurd, not least because they cannot, by definition, compare against a baseline.   
Worth it...right honey? ..'mmmmm mmmmrmmt'...
I'm not dead yet, I feel fine! http://www.brainhop.com/news-2692.html
Um...the UN created the state...Isreal faught a couple wars and kicked ass. What exactly did they steal?
The day Google doesn't release a flight simulator is the day only criminals have a flight simulator.
All seems pretty fair to me.
How much lipstick does a dude have to wear to write for c|net? http://i.i.com.com/cnwk.1d/i/bn/mugs/blog_don_reisinger.png
Okay, here's the actual text: "Apple declined to pay more than double the wholesale price for each NBC TV episode".  Meaning that NBC wanted to charge Apple twice as much, and Apple said no.  Apple's "markup" on the product is only about 3-5%; Jobs has admitted that iTunes exists to sell iPods. And it's not NBC's "fault" for raising its prices; they have every right to do that, but Apple doesn't want their customers to pay more than they already are, so they are exercising their right to not carry NBC's product under those new conditions.  Both parties are doing the right things by their own perspectives, it's just that NBC is being an idiot.
Ditto
No.  Separatist Santa workers.
Usually takes eight, but James is out today and now we all have to pick up the slack...we're 'hosed' as one may say.
The key though is that does not create _justice_ for the victims.  The victim must personally seek any damages they want compensated, and most victims don't have the resources or knowledge to do so. An easy example: Why do prisoners work in state run manufacturing facilities (license plates) for slave wages where the proceeds of their work go to the state?  Shouldn't it logically go to the victims of their crimes? Of course, if it were fair like that, where would it go in the case of victimless crimes?  Logically, a system that provided justice to victims couldn't really punish people when there wasn't a victim in the first place.
In my experience this doesn't scale.  Pure regression tests that have no semantic knowledge of what you are really trying to assert about your program just lead to false alarms that go off repeatedly and that everyone learns to ignore.  Updating the baselines becomes a tax you pay over and over.  Even with some allowable threshold, the majority of "test failures" turn out to be benign and the people charged with updating the baselines grow to resent the test and are somewhat less likely to pay attention to whether it has caught a legitimate problem. These tests primarily seem to just introduce friction that both holds things where they are but also impedes forward progress.
I think Rosie gave up on spoons a long time ago.
Thanks for the open sores. Obviously, the person *asking* for examples is the *exact right person* to *write* them. This makes so much sense it hurts.
No let's kill them all!
What about pirate monkeys vs robot ninjas?
Very interesting and well-thought out timeline. Definite upmod.
&gt;squids would eventually come out of the water Ha ha ha ha.  Here's a ticket.  No speeding in the Joke Lane.
They were a few thousand years ago, (and still are in a few remote spots about the globe), but we are enlightened now, whatever that means.
I did not see that he said the US planned to bomb Iran in any of the related articles I read. Did I miss something?
I will always upmod this!  Submit is a hundred times? A hundred upmods!  Fill the front page with this one!  Keep submitting!  GREAT WORK SUBBIE!!! LOVE IT!
I generally agree, but again another reason I wouldn't have pled guilty.
The punishment was just ridiculous. Banning students from extracurricular activities just sounds like a bad idea to me. Why not community service? Idle hands ...
Squish is a nice scriptable tester for Qt. http://www.froglogic.com/pg?id=Products&amp;category=squish&amp;sub=overview
&gt; well I would include every woman who adopts a baby as a woman who can't breastfeed her kid. http://breast-feeding.adoption.com/
Would you prevent women from covering up if they wanted to? If a woman wanted to wear a burka to the beach would you punish her?
Come talk to me after some human trash murders your mother or father. Then show me how caring and concerned you are.
woops, good catch.
&gt;Just last night I searched for "ruby multine regular expressions" and got a whole bunch of posts about python, mailing lists people asking questions etc. Click the link that says "Did you mean: ruby *multiline* regular expressions"
Hey, the gut is a viable mind alternative!
&gt; you do realize your history is for all to see? I do believe he’s aware, and yet doesn’t consider that to be such a bad thing.
&gt; you're going way beyond even the most rabid pro-lifers in trying to control women's bodies here Really?  Running a couple of ads encouraging breastfeeding is like blowing up abortion clinics, murdering physicians, and throwing women in jail for having elective surgery? Do tell.   
...And a monolith 1 x 4 x 9
Corrected. I'm working in my spelling and redaction every day. Eventually I'll be as good in my second language as you are in your first. Nevertheless, I'll use it for helpful comments.
&gt; Actually I believe that the problem with that in Sweeden is the low number of specialised doctors that can practice there ... I wonder why? ...
So the choice is 'taze or shoot'? Hmmm. What ever happened to all the other options that the police are trained for?
[Done and done.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Tx1XIm6q4r4)
This article is obviously anti cementic.
so the reddit gods are a step up on the social ladder from we redditors? i always kinda figured the opposite.
Well, I'm not sure that it does, but with LCD monitors, the backlight is either on or off- it's not done by the pixel.  So to display black, the monitor has to "cover up" a pixel that is otherwise backlit. Whether or not the screen is completely black, or completely white, the backlight is still on.  I'm just saying that it probably takes a tiny bit more energy to darken a pixel than to just leave it blank. I really don't know.  I'm just guessing.  But as someone said, either way, the whole principle is flawed.  It doesn't save energy, really, even in CRT monitors.
&gt;  I'm not sure that's what the baby would choose. Do you make your living selling formula?  Or misinformation? In every society, including those where women breastfeed exclusively, there is a period of time between birth and the onset of lactation, generally 2-3 days.  Exclusively breast-fed babies don't get much other than practice during this time.   Yet most of these babies cry less and suffer a lower incidence of the type of autoimmune diseases seen in Western countries.  The many benefits of excess calories, of course, are amply seen in the USA.   
Actualy it's __comments.rstrip() in Python.   BTW, Python rules. Really rules.
What will it take?  When the money is coming out of their pockets.  They don't give a shit about the money they take from mostly hard working Americans and give to the rich contractors, because then some of it becomes their money.  It's quite simple really.  Why should they care if their money comes from a bunch of sheep?
Well, Season 8 wasnt that bad... Ba'al was there a lot in Season 8, and that was good. Should have ended with the episode "Threads". Great ending for the series. Carter doesnt get Jack. :) I ignore everything after Season 8. 
I tend to disagree with most of what Kos says. Genetic is me.  : ) I could level critiques like that against the liberals as well. Some of them are fallacies by degree. It is always bad to "cast a wide net" as that article has done.
I won't hold my breath.
When it comes to foreign involvement, they may tend towards libertarianism.  But when it comes to social policy, [definitely not](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Paleoconservative_worldview#Culture_wars).
um,  I think if you actually try that, windows stops you because it currently is using the partition.  Nice suggestion though... thanks.
&gt; Too many people will be left without service just because most are incapable of planning ahead in any form.  Maybe most are 'incapable' of planning ahead because government has been encouraging them not to learn how to plan ahead. And I'm still waiting for someone to explain to me why should I pay for the healthcare of people who smoke, talk about not planning ahead.
Like what?  Hand to hand?  So now the cops AND the agressor will get hurt or killed.  Great option.
Option 2 will work if we elect someone who doesn't suck. I'm sure the U.N. does not want Iraq to tear itself apart. And if the U.N. doesn't think Iraq is worth saving, well, then it really is FUBAR and we shouldn't be wasting any more American lives anyways.
And yet somehow Bush will be *directly responsible* for this.
No he felt bad because they were not christians.
Well, we shouldn't have had our ecnomoy propped up by the fact that everyone could only use dollars to buy oil in the first place. That was a complete house of cards and was going to stop eventually anyway. Attacking every country who tries to deal oil using other currencies is probably the dumbest idea I've ever heard of. There are other ways to bolster our economy, like trying to eliminate the national debt (which will take a while by now, but still), working to become worldwide leaders in alternative energy source creation, or investing strongly in the education and creativity that originally brought us such success to begin with.
Are there a lot of experienced attorneys being court-appointed public defenders? Say with 10 or more years law practice?
Anyone notice that kuvaton.com seems to be stealing from xkcd?
That has me laughing.  Nice.
Did you both miss the P.P.S. in that post?
&gt; Honestly, I've met maybe three people that actually know how to use the program. Same here. I once met a technical writer who used Word as his main writing tool yet didn't know how to use styles.
If God says that is what you should wear to go swimming - Then God is a jerk!
Suspended? Whatta bunch of crybabies. He should have been rewarded for his cleverness.
&gt; These ads do cross the line. Indeed.  How dare the government encourage behaviors that could save billions or trillions of dollars in prevented illness down the line.  Their first responsibility is not to offend formula makers or women who can't nurse. Clearly, the priorities of the ad agency were all fucked up.  Thank goodness these helpful lobbyists lent a hand in showing them the right way to proceed. ps.  abortion nuts:  This is obviously Just Like Baby Killing.  I often see the Evil Government running ads that encourage abortion.  Special discount for late-term DNC procedures!   
This guy did all things wrong... First if you know your country...attach the kid to you so if you fall he fall too... 2. Use the kids as a body armor...  3. Dont kidnap a kid...thats not worth it...
get repaginator firefox extension. highly useful. https://addons.mozilla.org/en-US/firefox/addon/2099?lang=en-US
Q: How many angels could dance on the head of a pin?  A: As many as they want.
Maybe if bush actually apologized then people would raise their hands to help.
The best way to defeat usenet is to attack it with it's own strengths. Spam, spam, spam. . .   
Ooooh a spelling nazi. Nice.
The best justice money can buy. *edit* I wonder how O. J. Simpson would have fared had he been a *poor* black man? *end of edit*
Every night I pray for Jesse and Al's daughters to marry a white man.
&gt; Is there a particular part of the thread which you think is relevant to our conversation? I'm merely pointing out that there is two divergent concepts that we're discussing. The first is the one you originally brought up that there was no fight for rights in ww2. The second is that you countered that the US defending guam (and alaska, though you've ignored that) wasn't defending their right to freedom. &gt; It seemed that you were equating having one's freedom protected to protecting the right of self government. thats not a bad assumption, but there are other things that can be encompassed in "freedom" other than self-rule. What about the safety to travel outside of ones borders and maintain a degree of assurance from foreign government oppression while in their country or international waters? Thats just an example that "rights of freedom" isn't 100% self-rule. But I get your point that the most important right of freedom is self-rule. So lets clear the decks and focus in on the original argument. You're contending that ww2 was not a war meant to protect american's rights. I contend then that it protected our right to freedom (i.e. self or sovereign rule) of our territories.
He should just come out of the closet - he will have the gay vote!
*My biggest beef with horror flicks these days is that they hold back. I wanna see some disturbing shtuff that'll traumatize my dreams.*  ----------------  There's this new theater called 'Army Recruiter'.  Go there and tell them you want to see "Iraq".
What do you have against homosexuals? You are a stalker so you have no real standing on other peoples sexuality.
&gt; In every non-Islamic scenario we'd call a person who does that "insane". Tautology.  Islamists *are* batshit insane.   
They are - in Europe. In Holland, for example, there are no special topless beaches, because no one is going to stop you from taking your clothes off on the beach anyway.
That is a total load of ignorant garbage. Muslim women don't *get* to choose anything, they are consigned to being second-class citizens *from the moment they are born*. Take a good look at what 'women's rights' are under Islam:  http://www.atheistfoundation.org.au/islamrights.htm EDIT: I chose this source specifically so no one can brainlessly slam it as Christian right-wing Muslim-hating propaganda.
"War crimes, shmar crimes. Are those damned faggots getting married? No? Alright then. Bush can stay." This message brought to you by those I'm chosing to hold responsible for how fucked up this world has become.
How about the one at the end of clickable user names (in the main headline area)?
maybe someone pushed her in...
None. And they never will, either.
Great, now I'm obsessing over the bad taste in your mouth.
You, sir, owe me a keyboard not covered in 7up.
Yes. Republicans don't much like the idea of trials. It's all about going gitmo on their asses baby.
North, South, all the same ;)
Fuck this, no more Bushes, no more Clintons, no near misses to them. We need new blood.
Like taking my son to Karate tournaments. Music,reading,darts,bar-b-queing,Luca on ER.
What if "clean air, water and earth along with a healthy and diverse biosphere" is incompatible with human civilization?
Source for "More men are raped in this country than women," plz?
The women I'm talking about lives in UK btw.  Society in this case doesn't really count.   But I agree with you.  Probably the reason why she's wearing a burqa is because of the society demands.
Thanks Brian. Keep up the good work! Osama Bin Laden
Sickening. Profiteering at the expense of *infants*.
http://www.tradesports.com is a good one. They at least let you look at things before registering.
I wish a robot would roll in drinks right now...
True, most people are hypocritical in some way or another. But to expect that he would be hypocritical in this particular way seems especially cynical.
*Looks like you don't need to go all the way down to ZFC.* Right. Although Mizar does go all the way down to ZFC + another axiom, Automath is built on type-theoretic foundations and doesn't directly "reduce" to ZFC at all.
Why the hell is he sitting in the window where anyone could shoot him?
I'd put one up if I had any influence whatsoever.  And btw, any current or future employer will chip me over my dead body.
To think of it, Mr. Welsh, when he was born, certainly looked like a normal infant... I understand Adrianna is compassionate and wants to employ the mentally challanged but she should give them duties they are able to perform...
&gt; did you find any data Try Table V on page 53. 
I work for a company that produces software to manage service-oriented architectures, so as the saying goes "I'm getting a kick out of this article". It shows a lack of understanding of SOA, especially since this is 2007 and the standards for SOA-related technologies are well-established by now. 1- "SOA requires upfront architecture"  Well, it depends what one means by "architecture". If "architecture" means "a server of any type connected to a network", then that's correct. However the author seems to think that for every service you offer you need to have a full, vendor-specific implementation of J2EE, which is nonsense.  Most network-aware languages support SOAP in some way or other, and you can set up a simple LAMP server (using PHP5) which, once set up, can serve a standards-compliant SOAP service within about 5 minutes (PHP5 makes this insanely easy).  In fact because you can put together an application made up of disparate SOAP services running on completely different server in different location I would argue that going the SOA route requires *less* architecture because you just don't have to plan everything as a unitary system. SOA is just a logical extension of distributed systems in that it defines protocols for the interchange of data. It's only if you see it as a big, scary TLA that it becomes intimidating, and I think that's where the SOA industry is shooting itself in the foot. 2- "Strange loops"  That's a possibility. Then again you don't go around saying that "the web is bullshit" because your web page can have a link that leads to another web page which might not be there months or years down the line. If anything this is a striking proof that you don't need a big, scary architecture to use SOAP services as part of a SOA application. If you had this architecture in place you would control the services you link to and you wouldn't have to worry about this sort of situation...
The point is that it would be best if these people had CHOICES, rather than be forced to follow cultural edicts.
FWIW, this is the first time I've seen the headline. It interested me, so I clicked on it without even looking at the source. Sometimes it's a vast conspiracy. Sometimes it's just bad luck.
I have heard about the Michigan NOW! Initiative that is giving businesses free or very cheap rent for bringing business to Detroit and surrounding areas. Looks good on paper but the place is getting to be the ghetto so I have heard. Also Durham NC has places like this all over too. I have seen a house in the middle of nowhere for 800 bucks! it was a 2 room shack and 10 acres. I wanted to buy it when I was 15! Too bad it sold quick and was in a bad spot next to a saw mill.
you know, as I blindly skimmed through the article, the only word that caught my eye was "karma"
The thing is that there is no real content on it. It is a community. Think of reddit but in a private group
You better watch your ass England.. you guys are getting pretty oppressive over there. Are you trying to compete with the US cuz we'll take you down.  We used to sterilize our black people!
This is the hilarious true tale of two truck drivers who get even at a scale-house...
I can be terribly obsessive-compulsive with some things. And I never noticed this until now you assholes. Dear. Jesus. Aaaaaagh...
bullshit - how do you know? ever been there?
playing footsie is not against the law, trying to hook up with some unknown dude in the bathroom is downright inexcusable behaviour for a senator, the last time could have involved a minor for all we know. lying to a police officer is against the law, trying to overpower an officer of the law by pulling political weight is deplorable at minimum. we have enough powergame assholes in congress as it is already. one less nasty, naughty, bad boy there is a true blessing.
Ok, maybe I misinterpreted eadinad's comment.  I assumed he was questioning xutopia's comment, ie "Is that really in the Bible?"  Now I see that he may have been commenting on xutopia's use of Biblically when we were talking about Muslims.
I guess the murder and torture of innocent people doesn't bother you. 98% of the "terrorists" in these concentration camps are innocent. You should be waterboarded.
I believe it's called The *very* bad cop™
&gt; US female military staff who converted to Islam in Kuwait, which is significant I'm sure you'll find it on the same web page that claims Neal Armstrong converted to Islam because he heard the Ahzan in space.
Or cutting heads of parking meters -
I would advise you not to go to England. The thousands of educated, middle-class people fleeing there aren't doing it on a whim. Britan is becoming a Muslim colony.   
Have you ever talked with Muslim women who wear burkhas? I have. One woman asked me that is it true that all women in Europe walk naked in the streets. There was some confusion before it was cleared out that "streets" means outside of your home and "naked" includes showing your hair or shoulders (hair of the woman is considered extremely erotic in many Muslim countries). They were thinking that women in west are all whores. They would like law to prevent them (or their daughters) to do the same. It was not long ago than western countries had similar attitude against women.  Applying the golden rule works only if the cultural context is the same. Before women can be equal, people (men and women) must agree that women are equal (unless you want to enforce the law to foreign country from outside). 
Who are "these people". Do you have any evidence that she did not have the choice to wear that burka? Oh and you did not answer my question. Would you punish her if she chose to wear it?
This track was written in 2001. It's even more prescient now.  http://mohawkmedia.co.nz/mp3/chelfyn_evil_plans.mp3
you need spell check - badly
Perhaps there's similar social pressure even while in the UK amongst her family and friends? Perhaps not, just a thought.    
Is it now advisable for fathers and mothers-to-be to carry concealed weapons into the maternity ward? Or at least to have martial arts skills?
Looks like Brian Depalma wants to unseat Michael Moore as the Valedictorian of the Joseph Goebbels College of Communication. With this type of talent on the America hating left you can kiss our country good bye. Oh, that is unless Bush apologizes to whoever and then everything will be OK....because geopolitics and national interests are always dictated by pride. Idiot leftists will eventually get us all killed, just like they always have in history, over and over and over and over again.
The key word is /an/, as opposed to, in your original comment, /they/.
really? wow, thank you for the new information, your're a freakin' bloodhound!!
did they slam it against the wall or a against the table?
yeah, never mind that the costs associated with rolling out fiber optic all over the continental u.s. would be staggering.   japan is about the size of california.
The more they delay fixing it, the more traffic they get while you keep checking  :)
Google is actually quite forgiving about spelling, but you shouldn't be surprised that it can't find things like "multine" without a little help.
I agree, driving is hazardous to your health at times...
Yes, but the constitution is supreme only with regards to the *powers** enumerated to it.  For example, after the first amendment was created many states continued to have official churches. It would have ridiculous to call that "unconstitutional," as it wasn't supposed to have anything to do with how states deal with the church, just how the federal government does.
stupid greedy fucking fag republicans and their man-cunt licking lobbyists.  I want my god damn fiber
good question. who's we? count me out - I don't support it.
ok
It was only three days... of in-school suspension! FFS.
So anyone tried crashing into a building yet?
I'm from New Zealand. My phone number *is* 7.
But you don't have to abolish the second amendment to make your case. The DC ban (as bad as I think it was, and I live within a few miles) was not unconstitutional and should not have been overturned by the federal government, who constitutionally should have had no jurisdiction in the matter.
&gt;I'm surprised - reddit seems schizoid.  You have no idea what "schizoid" means, do you? From your post, you seem to think it means something it doesn't.
True.  But I know her family and her friends and she's the only one with the scarf :)
Terrorism, not the UN, created that pseudo-state.  Think Deir Yassin. The UN just ratified it.
I think there's a hardboiled core of about 100 idiots on this site who do nothing but submit crap like this, mod each other up, and generally wreck this place for everyone else.
Just noticed http://www.python.org/dev/peps/pep-3135/ is in, which replaces the ugly (and hard to remember):  super(Foo, self).foo(1, 2) With the much more pleasant:  super.foo(1, 2)
I'd prefer to pay $9 a gallon.  Isn't this just galling?  My extra $6 per gallon is worth more than your life.  Mind you, I live in California and I have to drive 20 miles to work each day.
This assumes the original poster (fartcatcher) was familiar with the WP COI guidelines. The post was certainly not offtopic.  Or, by asking it the way he has, he is raising the question "do you think that the drug companies respect Web 2.0, etc, enough to follow the rules laid out thus?"
Of course they bloody were. Why else was such a fierce propaganda smoke-screen of 'freedom fries' created, if not to take the American public's eyes away from some simple truths?
Have just read THE READERS DIGEST story on this. If accurate, this guy was a real dirtbag and deserved much much worse.
&gt;Who are "these people". EVERY HUMAN BEING ON THE PLANET. &gt;Oh and you did not answer my question. Would you punish her if she **chose** to wear it? Excuse me? If you read my comment, the answer should've been blindingly obvious: NO! As I said, it would be best if these people had **CHOICES**.
I guess she doesn't have to worry about shaving bikini lines. Gross.
very cute
&gt;The modern "conservative" fallacy is that free markets means lack of government regulation. That isn't even close to what it means -- what it means is a market with many actors, relatively transparent information, and no one actor or group with pricing power, whether through collusion or monopoly."   The reason there is little relative transparency and a high degree of collusion and monopolistic behavior is because the government legislates in favor or incumbent players (such as the telecoms in this case), which in my opinion was a direct consequence of it getting involved in the market in the first place.   What this snippet is saying is that the government is both the cause and the solution to this problem.  You just have to cross your fingers and hope they'll do the right thing.   
it doesnt show up if you arent logged in. maybe its intentional... an easter egg for members
Yeah, that's what *she* was commenting on. : )
Hey, but he's got a nice hairdo...
But women are just fine being preoccupied with men's eyes and thoughts?
I agree with you.  In western countries men are forced to use humiliating ropes around their necks and wear black clothes. It is not law of course, but you are actively discriminated if you are not wearing slave outfit. This oppression is so widely accepted that most men in west claim that they actually like it and don't feel humiliated.
I don't know how you define revenge, but this seems like a pretty good definition to me:  "action taken in return for an injury or offense" To me that seems exactly like what you're saying.
&gt; Greg Kavalec Says:  Comment #12, posted on August 31st, 2007 at 16:52 &gt;“P = NP” is the nine billionth name of God.   Couldn't quite keep up with the math or the physics - knew enough to get a gist but not fully follow... maybe that is why I found this comment humorous - and a nice nod to Clarke.
wow, she is hot!
[The number of rapes per capita in the United States has plunged by more than 85 percent since the 1970s, and reported rape fell last year even while other violent offenses increased, according to federal crime data.](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2006/06/18/AR2006061800610.html) The Washington Post article doesn't even mention male prison rape. It's just one of those things people really don't care about apparently.   [Prison rape commonly refers to the rape of inmates in prison by other inmates or prison staff. According to Human Rights Watch, there is a significant variation in the rates of prison rape by race. Stop Prisoner Rape, Inc. statistics indicate that there are more men raped in U.S. prisons than non-incarcerated women similarly assaulted. They estimate that 25,000 inmates are raped each year; that young men are five times more likely to be attacked; and that the prison rape victims are ten times more likely to contract a deadly disease.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prison_rape)   
Table V compares **4 other Scheme implementations** to Stalin. Did you find any data demonstrating Stalin was **"as fast as C"** ? Did you find even one discussion of the performance of Stalin relative to C in the whole paper?
Left-click inside the map window before CTRL-ALT-A  hope it works for you
&gt; Obviously, the person asking for examples is the exact right person to write them. Exactly! I'm glad someone gets it. The *best* examples are those written be folks who have just figured something out; they know where the stumbling blocks were, and they know the tidbits they needed to start down the right track. Of course, someone skilled then needs to review the example to make sure they're not, well, messed up -- but review is *far* easier than writing. My offer applies to you, too. Shit or get off the pot.
...don't forget a proper supply of ammos and you are set.
This is actually a very cool idea.
Well it did look like a rope or wire tied around his waist - 1) I couldn't think of another descriptive term 2) I thought if what I saw was correct and the cop fell, the internal injuries would *really* suck 3) didn't think any police force was dumb enough to just tie off with a rope [belt] in an elevated situation (river rescue perhaps).
what planet are you on? maybe obsession is too strong a term. But, if men were indifferent to female breasts, among other female organs, humanity would have ceased to exist a long time ago.   
The question was whether this picture was taken in a country with such rules.
Canada, UK and USA have the worst "Internetz" ever, wtf guys even France do better (Merci Free).
'... And in other news, the nations productivity index plummeted this month after the decriminalization of female toplessness and a brutal heatwave combined to distract every male worker in the US.  On a related note: Car crashes increased 97% in the same period'
efficiency
yea! rip those investors real good!
stark? fuck you nyt. change is good motherfuckers because obviously what was done in the past didn't work..so fuck off with your cherry picked and insidious use of adjectives you media whores.
http://cactus.eas.asu.edu/Partha/partha.jpg
Ouch. Good question. Do you think those things are incompatible with human civilization? I don't think I'd want to live in any civilization where that was the case. If you're asking whether I would choose civilization or nature if it came down to a fight, all I can say is that I would pick the people and places I love and leave the labeling and abstraction to others.
It's true, it's all an expansion of powers granted by Vietnam not being a declared war and the President always has more Executive power in matters of national security during times of War.  Ever since our Country was founded, we asked for a powerful Federal Branch, powers near like a King. I prefer the latter, that the Legislative take the lead in matters of national intervention as well as using the President as the Executive ambassador to carry out it's orders, and to be held in contempt for not doing so.  However, our Constitution doesn't define any such thing.  It would be nice if the President acted as a Governor over a state, the concerns and welfare of it's constituents. However, as this story suggests, they prefer the term Legislative. The powers of war were transferred, oh but momentarily and yet forever, when we said it's okay to go into Afghanistan, it's okay for the Patriot Act, it's okay for aggresion against Iraq, it's okay for Executive Orders on all legislative documents.  It's ok President, just do whatever you want once you have Commander in Chief status.
Pragmatic my ass. Apple hates standarts. There are things that simply will never change.
You do know you can just go to any location and just start from there, when you start the flight sim select "current location" from the options.
FTW.
You agree with the headline or with the article? I only ask because there seems to be something, uh, ethereal about the tone of the article.
Reported.
We don't, but someone close to you hired us.
I like the bit about how you know what his fate will be...
The benchmark is just badly done. They should compare ZFS RAID-Z setup with normal raid setups on other systems.
That was harsh judgment for my words.
Article forgot to point out that when NBC and Universal return with their tails between their legs, their deal will be even **worse** than it is now.
That's the bad propaganda
Don't think so. The city of Houston is built in the lower watershed of the San Jacinto River. Given how flat the city is, it probably wouldn't take too much to shift the West Fork down into heavily developed areas. And then there's the Brazos River to the west of the city. You're not one of those silly people that think Texas is a desert, are you?
Ummagumma is an totally experimental work, so it kinda doesn't count. The first album, The Piper At The Gates Of Down, is awesome, as is Atom Heart Mother (70). Pretty much every album from Floyd is not only great, but very different from each other, until Dark Side Of The Moon (73). Wish You Were Here (75) is the last breath of inspiration of the band.  Animals (77) is so so, The Wall (79) is more like a Roger Water's solo album. Everything from Floyd after that is crap. The same happened to Yes, their last good album was Relayer (74), the rest is crap. Queen had a different history. The last good rock album is A Night At The Opera (their fourth). After that there was also News Of The World was ok, too). But instead of continuing to produce crappy rock music, they turned totally pop, but good pop.
very difficult when all the empathy has already been distributed to the truly needy, and those victimized by the horrendous redtape created by this closet manwhore taking up space in congress.
Well, the powers that be the DoD network have been controlled by the military ever since it's creation, at least to the extent that they still run there own ISP and offer it to service members, so why not filter content out that are not within the objectives of the Commander in Chief?
I was waiting for that...I work in PHP and ASP...I may have even gotten my syntax wrong at this time of day.  *YAWN*
Pig get some of the medicine he used to administer to others... LOL
Unprofessional?  Who cares about semantically-neutral differences in the HTML? Maybe it makes sense for the whitespace to be there when you look at code that generates this HTML. It's an implementation detail that should absolutely not concern you.  (The visible space is a concern, though!)
But I heard a rumor that Dave Lewis, State Senator from Montana, is a pedophile who has molested many young boys while serving in the Montana legislative and is considered to be a menace by those who really know the truth about him.
Any more tips for an aspiring kidnapper?
What about the ones selling for [$1](http://homes.realtor.com/search/listingdetail.aspx?ctid=2959&amp;ml=3&amp;mnp=2&amp;mxp=7&amp;typ=1&amp;sid=36498fc5e9fd4e20b71c1dc14c9c2d70&amp;pg=11&amp;lid=1082093023&amp;lsn=101&amp;srcnt=3459#Detail") I found a bunch under $1000 starting on page 11. 
white bread is for whimps.
I dunno, it looks like it worked pretty well to me...
So?
Dumbass! What prevented him from asking some American to "buy" the car and, then, "re-sell" it to him?
Exactly, it seems like most of her writing is geared towards self-help and recovery from all the abuse she suffered. Time to legalize prostitution all over the states, it's way too dangerous for the girls while illegal.
typical zionist reaction to hearing the truth
This is somewhat related: The **Alfa Group** is a counter-terrorism unit that belongs to the Federal Security Service of Russia (formerly known as the KGB). In October 1985, Alfa Group was dispatched to Beirut when four Russian diplomats had been taken hostage by militant Sunni Muslims. By the time Alfa was onsite, one of the hostages had already been killed. The perpetrators and their relatives were identified by supporting KGB operatives, and the latter were taken hostage by Alfa. Following the standard policy of 'no negotiation', Alfa proceeded to sever some of their hostages' body parts and sent them to the perpetrators with a warning that more would follow if the Russian hostages were not released immediately. The tactic was a success and no other Russian national has been taken hostage in the Middle East for the next 20 years.
I'm not splitting hairs here, and I'm afraid I can't find the story, but I was surprised when it came out a few years back that the sun-swallows-earth stuff I'd grown up with was based (iirc) on a mistake. [It is calculated that the Sun will become almost sufficiently large to engulf the current orbits of some of the solar system's inner planets, including Earth. However, the gravitational pull of the Sun will have weakened by then due to its loss of mass, and all planets but Mercury will escape to a wider orbit.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Red_giant)
&gt; The FACT is that breastfeeding is better for babies, and just because some women cannot breastfeed doesn't change that fact. Furthermore, the fact that some women can't breastfeed surely does not make it insensitive to point out the benefits to the rest.   People today take offense at everything.  Sheesh.  Next you know the "smoking causes emphysema with Y% likelihood" reports will be insensitive to smokers.
Even so, I don't know if he's really worth $75,000/year.
infowars.net = LMAO
And, yet, in densely populated cities and tech centers in the US, broadband is *still* much more expensive.
Yes!
WHAT THE HELL?!!
Daily dose of spam quotes...  Now with a poll for best day this week...
Hey, at least we're not 'piling on'!
Because he made money from speaking engagements means he made it off 911? You are fucking retarded. Clinton make more than that from speaking. Lots of politicians make good money from speaking engagements. God the stupidity of people like you make me sad to be an American sometimes.
The Rose Bowl Hoax is the original classic -- and virtually untoppable. It was gutsy, it was calculating, it was devastating, and its effect was immediate with an audience of many millions.  Caltech students are generally the better prankers; it's just that MIT is bigger, so they get more publicity.
"Rubinstein's participation in this weekend's Zionist Federation conference in London has been cancelled by mutual agreement." I can just picture the exchange:    Zionist Federation: Daniel Rubinstein?    Rubinstein: Yes.    Zionist Federation: You can forget about your upcoming event, you nazi-loving, self-hating, anti-semitic, piece of sh*t!    You're finished in this town!    And if we can help it, you can kiss your job goodbye!    Rubinstein: But . . . [click]
It has nothing to do with the cancellation of Raines?
What I see in the picture is a group of people enjoying themselves in the sea.  Call me sentimental if you like but I think its a nice image.  The guy has a pleasant expression and looks like he is helping his wife, sister, mother, aunt, you cant tell from the picture what their relationship is. The kids look like they're having a blast.  Everyone knows that some muslim women dress this way, do people expect them to strip off at the beach?
It doesn't really matter, hibryrd's point is still valid.
You people have no idea what a hippie is.
And of course we all know how well McCain did in 2000
Somebody should show the Gmails being flushed into a pipe and then rattling around through the internet pipes, then series of trucks!
And if boobs cease to exist, guys will look and wonder, "What happened to the treasure chest?"
O. C. D.
Agreed.  Rarely do I think patriots are in love with their country's climate or the unique flora/fauna.  It's the people, the food, the customs, the type of humor, etc.
It was a joke.
I'm very happy for them, but seriously boys, you need to get some sun.
&gt;It's not like we are grabbing Arabs willy-nilly in the middle east and just tossing them in Gitmo. Spoken exactly how a Fox News viewer would describe Gitmo's detainees.
Very powerful post.
Probably royalties, payments for appearances, concert profits, etc. Pretty obvious really
Looks like a Samsung S730 if anyone cares...
The matrix isnt the main AI Intelligence...  The Matrix is THE MATRIX.  There is no "main AI".  Its a collective intelligence, but the individual robots can be as independent as humans.
Counter-terrorists win!
Where in Europe?
Yea, im sorry if you thought I'd do that on purpose.  I was trying to find where the damn link was at the end of the comment link.  Opera shows it as a button.  And the text never changed so I couldn't tell anything happened.  I really appreciate the time you took to show your dissatisfaction with my error.
From snooping around:  http://www.google.ca/search?hl=en&amp;sa=X&amp;oi=spell&amp;resnum=0&amp;ct=result&amp;cd=1&amp;q=%2B%22what+is+quikclot%22&amp;spell=1 http://www.bestglide.com/quikclotpage.htm &gt; QuikClot brand hemostatic agent® is granulated mineral  &gt; substance whose exact composition is proprietary.  &gt; The new QuikClot ACS Plus™ consists of beads contained  &gt; in a porous surgical fabric that allows the activated  &gt; beads to come into direct contact with blood in a wound  &gt; and quickly stop the bleeding. That sounds like what they use in Always Ultra maxi pads... &gt; Because it contains no biological or botanical  &gt; substances, it eliminates the danger of an allergic  &gt; reaction or transmission of disease. Really?  Can they really say that?  I know of people who have reactions to metals.
JFK is in the default list at least.
+1
I totally disagree. It is the right of every man or woman to decide for themselves what they want to do with their life, as long as they aren't hurting anyone else. If a woman wants to cover her body as a symbol of her devotion to her husband and her religion, fine by me(but you better believe that her husband better feel the same way, or I agree that it's not right). As much as I hate to say it, equality or opportunity should be what we're striving for: the opportunity to act and think the way you think is right, and right for you. We aren't even close to being there yet. Every generation tends to think that they've got it as good as it gets, but like hell if we're there.
killing 24 people is now "Nazi-Like"? Comparing something like this to one of the most horrible acts in human history just demeans the holocaust.
Got it, http://www.slatev.com/player.html?id=1155290759
1 day in fail.
Small problem - until there is a **viable** alternative to iTunes you will not have a consumer base.  So the time between ditching iTunes and successfully replacing it with another/your own service you will suffer not only rampant piracy but also massive advertising and loss-leader costs just to get a toe-hold.  Microsoft has the pockets for Zune which currently faces this - their online fee service uses the MS DRM codecs but their players allow [for audio: MP3 (.mp3), AAC (Low complexity) (.aac, .mp4, .m4a, .m4b, .mov), WMA (.wma); for video: MPEG4 (in .mp4, .m4v and .mov containers), H.264 (in .mp4, .m4v and .mov containers), WMV (.wmv), ASF (.asf); and for still images: JPEG (.jpg).Zune software can also convert other popular video and audio formats(with registry tweaks) supported by Windows Media Player 11 including dvr-ms which zune was criticized for not having.Although the files cant be played on the zune software the files will convert and synced to the zune player.Files for the tweak can be found here ... synchronizes music, pictures, and videos to the device.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Zune#Zune_Software)  Other players allow for unlocked codecs.  Enough people are fed up with MS DRM that they *had* to allow non-DRM stuff to play.  People are also sick of Apple DRM, but the selection and price are barely in line with what the market will bear. MS isn't going to give Universal/NBC much better terms so they will go it alone.... good luck, MS is *just* now starting to make money on the xBox family though still losing it on the 360 - and Universal/NBC doesn't have Windows/Office to subsidize their efforts for 15 years.
Story background: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Betty_and_Barney_Hill The shows web site/where to listen: http://www.coasttocoastam.com/info/wheretolisten.html
I have never understood why people like the author of this article try and warn companies (or individuals) of their folly and impending self-harm, when those people bloody well have it coming.
Coke
tittilating, tittilicious, tittifiable, aw, heck, she is all titties!
Haven't you heard? "There's a place in France..."
Nah, I honestly don't think many people care about that any more.  Bush's appointees have been racially (if not ideologically) diverse.  Condoleezza has been touted as a Republican presidential candidate.  Even Pat Buchanan's 2000 running mate was a black woman.
&gt; Literacy is *abismal* in the arab world even though they have tons of money. .... Tribalism *sounds nice on paper* .. Arabs have demonstrated throughout history they are race *supremists*.  Tee hee. I think your post *isn't the worth the paper it's printed on.*
then you fuck her 3 or 4 more times. duh!
great post/s on being an Ambulance Paramedic
These are macro photographs of meat. (Obviously.) Meat still contains traces of clotted blood that hasn't drained away in the course of butchering.  As we all know blood clots when exposed to air hence the occasional "discoloration blob" that occurs. Also quotes like: "By the way, taking these pictures almost made me sick." almost certainly means that the photographer is a vegetarian or maybe even a vegan. Take these pictures of meat with a pinch of salt, although I prefer mine smoked.
When Karl Rove accuses Obama of having a black child in South Carolina, that might be a good thing this time around.
&gt;and have extraordinary good looks including such features as jet black hair, blue eyes, milk white skin, (occasionally olive) and blood red lips. You mean they look like vampires?
If you give it away it is not stolen.  This may sound like nitpicking, but propaganda relies on it. As long as bloggers can write that "government steals from us", they don't alienate their readers and can generate anger against their government. If they instead would write that "We, the majority of people are so fucking dump that we vote people based on one-liners that show on TV.", people would see who are to blame: "the majority of voting age citizens". 
That's barbaric.  Taking more innocent hostages is not justifiable.
That's called a randomized algorithm.  It is a pretty thoroughly studied topic. The thing is, if you could find a correct solution 50% of the time in 1 second, you could do so 75% of the time in 2 seconds, 87.5% in three seconds, 100*(1-.5^n)% in n seconds.  So, there is very little difference between 'very high probability' and 'any probability significantly different from zero'
Yes, I assume he is a hypocrite.  Not knowing whether or not he is fat or has a hairy back, I can't say for sure if he is a hypocrite, I can only assume.  But I know he is a jerk.   His comments was essentially the same as saying that ugly people should have to wear bags over their heads.  Criticizing someone for things they have no control over, and insisting they comply with his idea of appropriate public dress makes him no better than those insisting that the woman pictured wear a burka while swimming.
[TargetAlert.](http://www.bolinfest.com/targetalert/) The line extends below the new tab icon.  Works pretty well.
&gt; [Mike Seth wrote] There is racism in Israel, but it's neither as widespread as the "center against racism" wants me to believe, nor is it focused solely on arabs. Arabs are an integral part of Israeli society. Only the least intelligent and educated members of this society can afford being openly racist, and I am somewhat glad neither I nor anyone I know belong to that species. &gt; [Survey Says] The survey, which was conducted for the Center Against Racism, also found that over 75 percent of participants did not approve of apartment buildings being shared between Arabs and Jews. Sixty percent of participants said they would not allow an Arab to visit their home.
Yeah, if you like pyramid schemes, that is!!
oh, yeah. And they number in the what? Tens, twenties?
Everything you need to know about alternative and renewable energy sources and fuel like biodiesel,biofuel, wind power, solar power etc.
LOL!  As long you are a sycophant, the Republicans will put anyone in any position.  Heck of a job, millstone!
pedantic=arseholy???
They have to many kids for all of them to get a free education. I think everyone I know is part Irish.
Heard that one too;  the religion of peace (tm);  all the atrocities are committed by a tipsy tiny minority of extremists.  Honest.   It just so happen that noone (in the 'muslim world' does anything against it nor protest in anyway whatsoever) Yep,  I believe you.   And why would you bring christians to the discussion?  why should I care or be in anyway concerned about christians? As for 'brainwashing by american media' you dolt:  I grew up in Europe,  where muslims are difficult to avoid.  Just had to open my eyes to get a pretty accurate education on the subject.
I was expecting a chart...
the second comment made me crack up
That's why I've always called him "Georgie Boy".
the barn, mate. the barn. always a good source of straw.
I apologize, but I had no way of knowing what your gender was.
Not lately...always.
He looks like he's having fun.  I have no idea what she looks like, which, I reckon is the idea.  I hope you can have fun like that, but I wouldn't and won't know.   
NSFW
Be warned, google earth doesnt work with linux (or at least ubuntu fiesty).   
Question marks also work.
I thought it was "The World Without U.S." That sure would help a lot, Without the rest of the population having to disappear.   Let the downmods begin!
&gt;Iran openly shells Iraq? Says who? Link please. [Guardian](http://www.guardian.co.uk/Iraq/Story/0,,1852843,00.html) [Time Magazine](http://www.time.com/time/world/article/0,8599,1654449,00.html)   [BBC](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/middle_east/4960478.stm) Al Jazeera (English) appears not to mention it (only did cursory search) Purposefully left out Fox ... obvious reasons here.
douches mitigate some suffering, fyi.
911 was an inside job!! Wake up sheeple!
American Cancer Society? Why, those stupid liberal freaks!
I stopped reading after the comment about shooting them with M16 machine guns.  An m16 is not a machine gun plus US troops mainly use the m4. I can accept that some civilians have been killed and injured in error but to state that the US is executing civilians "nazi style" is going way too far.  There are too many of these sites spreading utter rubbish about what goes on in Iraq.
Take out "shouting match" and put in "reasoned, democratic discussion" and I've got no problem with number two.
Well, this is because someone's an idiot and hasn't gotten it reassessed.  If so much damage has been done to it that the house can't be resold for more than $1500, the taxes should be considerably lower.  On the other hand, if the owner cared so little that they let it deteriorate this badly, odds are that they didn't care to pay the taxes, much less have anyone assess the property.
Already been posted before, still an ad for a book, reported as spam yet again.
I don't like that they're using bottles, instead of a generic formula can. It's a slap in the face to those of us who pump and deal with the self proclaimed boob nazis who assume bottle==formula. Not every baby who gets breast milk gets it straight from the breast. Moms who pump go through a lot already, since it's the worst of both worlds. Not only do you have to pump, and do more dishes, but you get to be the butt of "haha, you're like a dairy cow on a milk machine" jokes from coworkers when you go to your pumping area.  I was one of those that could not breastfeed. My son was in the NICU for a month, and I was not allowed to even try to nurse him until we were at home. Our NICU religiously measured everything that went and out of my son, and formula was easier for them because they had known values for the amount calories my son consumed. It is very hard to build up a good supply if you get off to as poor of a start as I did. We spent probably about $700 over 3 months on hospital grade pump rental and lactation consultants. This was not covered by insurance. A lot of women don't have $700 to burn in an attempt to breast feed.  There are a lot of working moms who are away from their babies most of the day. If the government truly wants to promote breastfeeding, they need to promote alternatives, like pumping. If you want to pump and not supplement, you need to be able to pump at times other than your lunch break. In my experience, it's easier for people to get a smoke break than a pumping break. As long as that is true, formula is going to feel like the only option for many working moms.
Google is so funny I cannot stop laughing... Give me a break! Are we going to post each stupid thing that companies do to look cool?
It's not my place to decide if beating women over their clothing is appropriate?  I think I'm okay with not "getting it" if it means standing by while a group of people does unjustified physical harm to another group of people. Oh, and maybe it's just a part of my culture to criticize other cultures.  Ever think of that?  How dare you disrespect my cultural values.  Where do you get off criticizing me? Cultural relativism eats itself.
better question.... is that a blow up doll??? i mean... look at the hands!!
Yeah but you have to realize you're talking about companies like General Electric and Vivendi (and if other studios were to follow they'd be similar behemoths like Sony).  The lost revenue for a few years on piracy or whatever is a drop in the bucket for these multinational corporations.  Of greater concern to these companies long term is the ability to control their content's distribution.  Sure they'll take it in the ass now and for a few years, but if the other studios follow suit, Apple loses its monopoly on online content distribution, and *that* is what I think the studios are really going after, not the ability to charge $5 an episode. This is why the Microsoft/IBM comparison is such a good one:   if IBM could have realized sometime in the mid 80's what Microsoft was on the cusp of after DOS was used in all their earliest computers, don't you think it would have been worth it to IBM to try to somehow intervene and prevent Microsoft from having them over the barrel down the road, regardless of what short-term losses they might incur? The studios see Apple as almost having as much or more control over their content as they do, and regardless of what it costs them in the short term they know they need to secure that control over their product.
I like things our way, basic human rights and all that, thanks.
I think you missed the point
The Howler needs his own show on NBC, CBS, ABC and FOX.
The Fifth Column makes movies. I'll save my money.
Pointless, could take a film crew and do the same in any country about anything.  Try asking working stiff in Australia to locate Utah on a map, or any other assorted questions. Anyone hear of editing?
&gt;Sometimes it's a vast conspiracy I wish this were a joke, but it isn't.  These jokers should be arrested for their BAD joke!
&gt;Oh how cute. When the govt collapses you will no longer be held down by the rest of humanity and will soar! What will you be doing then?
Nah - they are the same people who always said that Hugo Chavez would abide by the Venezuelan constitution... well they are partially right - he is... only he got it changed. Hmmm.. I can think of another [former] world/nation leader *legally* elected to power who later had the laws "legally" changed to allow dictatorship for life....
Have you been on vacation since [April](http://reddit.com/info/1k6qy/comments/c1kbev)?
Our troops are being fed lies and propaganda, like the rest of us.  Wonder whose idea this was...
A great site on how to make balloon animals and where to go for further information.
I wish it were a bit easier to contribute to the docs. It's good that it's possible to contribute to them at all, but I wish they were a Wiki, or something similar. If vandalism is a concern, changes could be human reviewed; that would still be easier (fewer clicks, etc.) than it is now.
No, we need people who read books, instead of falling back on schoolyard songs and happy memories of coloring handprint turkeys. Columbus orchestrated some of the most brutal, and complete (even Hitler and Stalin together didn't get ALL the Jews) genocides of all time.
It's funny that those very nerds are modding you down. A+ plus meta-joke.
"Oppressed"?  Yes.  "As much"?  No.  No, see, we don't make a habit of *beating* women who don't conform to our dress codes.
&gt;"Let us not forget that the Iraq war was only illegal from an International standard. Congress approved action against Iraq." Congress never approved a war, they approved removal of Saddam by force. The Congress was lied to when they were told by the administration that force would be used only as a last resort. The authority to use force was intended to give leverage to Bush at the UN, not to actually go to war. But authority was stupidly given to go in, and through dishonesty, Bush did go in.   
Yah… stupid us for having due process…
I don't like pacman ¬¬ but everything else is pretty good to me, thanks for the recommendation. [arch](http://www.archlinux.org/)++
It offended your neocon sensibilities?  For that, sir, I apologize.
one last...don't give your tips to anyone...unless you know he is in the police
Oh, no offense taken. I'm aware I'm wildly outnumbered.
Tacit consent.
they cannot imagine it because the overclass in america has made white men the demon of history, and that helps the overclass escape blame. After all, only 1.5 percent of all whites in america owned slaves in 1860 (see the census). And not only that, but in the 1600s the majority of whites living in the american colonies were indentured slaves, and many of them lived lives of slavery. See my blog and video on this matter (google up "Homo Sapiens Americanus" and "white slaves").   
nah he got 13 years...plus getting shot 2 bullets in the head and fell 5 floors...big operations....but before all these 2004 drama he comes from some dirt poor shitty village in the mountains, has 3 kids and was robbed penniless in that city.....  some guys just have the shitiest luck
There are stupid white boys(I've seen 'em), crackers (yeah) and pollacks.  Ok maybe not pollacks, but my point was, this guy may very well have been worthy of the punishment.   
I wish I could love Emacs. Looking in it's great--super efficient and loaded. But, between the learning curve and lack of critical features (decent code completion, for example) I just can't bring myself to take the time to learn it. I've tried VIM and jEdit to no avail. Why, oh why, can't I find editorial peace?
You mean if you can't see the difference between an American on TV and some Chinese guy you'd have otherwise never heard about.
http://debate.uvm.edu/handbookfile/WMD2002/020a.htm Here's some remedial coursework for you. Take it over to the kids table, and leave the grownups to their coversation.
Sure did, and it's all thanks to you. Wait til I tell George! Do you mind redoing your post using only single-syllable words?
Shit!  Between checking all the doorknobs in my house, washing my hands incessantly and, NOW, staring at the linked comments space,I'M NEVER GONNA GET LAID!
Actually, the crime the Nazis were hanged for at the Nuremberg trials was not the Holocaust. The worst thing the Nazis did?  Their "Supreme International Crime"?  Starting a war of aggression, on false pretenses.   How many Iraqi civilians have been raped, killed, or both due to the illegal invasion and occupation?  How many millions have been displaced, or are starving?  I guess that if they have brown skin, it doesn't matter.   The strange thing is people are surprised, or even doubtful, that rape and murder are happening in Iraq.  If you're not willing to rape and murder for a cause, *don't support a war over it*.
We do not! We have no brownshirts! (We have white shirts/aka Homeland Security)
But....that would mean US victory.  That's a bad thing for Reddit.
Not to mention the Iranians on Iraqi soil are just "advisers" much like we had in Vietnam until the mid 1960's - or the Russians had in Vietnam throughout (I will not include Korea since there is now ample evidence that many of *those* MIG pilots *were* Russian pilots accruing real combat experience).
Why do people keep saying this? I'm from San Francisco and I've been to Europe several times. San Francisco is just the best parts of America rolled into one area. It's nothing like Europe except being more densely populated than most American cities.
Done! Now what?
Israeli muslims have just as many rights as Israeli jews do... Israeli muslims have a lot more freedoms than Saudi, Afghani, Iraqi, Pakistani, or Somali Jews do... Tell me, why is it again that it is ok for the Torah to be forbidden in Saudi Arabia? Ohh that's right, it's because Saudi Arabia really is an apartheid state, unlike Israel. The double standards of the left are really insane. I for one do not endorse attacking Iran, but I do feel that we should be engaging in a cold war with these people.  How is it that the country that hangs all infidels (Iran) is somehow better than the country that gives a fair trial to a Hamas leader who ordered a 12-year old girl to blow up a pizzeria?  If only my leftist brothers would see that fascists are fascists, even if they are Muslim...
I get the feeling that the statues didn't "disintegrate" so much as they were repossessed and melted down into tools and weapons by later passing-by or occupying peoples who had no need for representations of the Greek's gods.
Relativism isn't philosophy, it's laziness.
Easy - He moonlights as a gay prostitute, and doesn't want to appear soft on homos.
With straight sides?  No splashing?  No explosive gas releases spewing frothy lava latte all over the countryside?  The rim seems insufficiently crinkly somehow... we must await new views of this location.
Its as if slaughtering civilians isn't evil enough, it has to be "nazi-like." What piffle.  Don't trivialize this horrible shit...
If kids get sheltered too much they are gonna be naive little shits that will vote for someone worse the dubya and it will be idiocracy all over again! When they have a simple fall they will have the worst panic attack.
FYI, I trust the NY Times or most other established periodicals a smidgen more than the lovely Daily Kos.  And no, I'm not some crazy right wing conservative either.
I'm sure it helps, but it doesn't replace professional help.
Yes, quite. Overgeneralizing and exaggerating.
Great, the only airport they list in Chicago is the one that doesn't exist anymore, Meigs. Pretty funny, Google!
That's not going to help your drooling problem.
We have snipers take shot hostage holders all of the damned time.  No, we don't have people playing rambo jumping window to window and whatnot, because that is more dangerous to the officers and the hostage. I've footage of a SWAT sharpshooter shooting the gun out of a hostage holders hand when he waved it out of the window. The way we do it may be a little more expensive, but I've never seen a hostage taker get what he wanted in the U.S. either.
Isn't that the same argument women in the middle east use for covering their hair?
shaddap.
Who hasn't fantasized about being the last person alive on earth?
&gt; Yeah, my links at the top of the page are better. Your links are different!  A randomized algorithm is a not the same as an approximation algorithm.  (One is exact, usually, and the other is close, always.)  And (weirdly) the imperfect solutions link doesn't even mention randomized algorithms.
&gt;"I just don't think many people really think through many of these political issues on reddit." And there is something that makes you believe they think through, or even care about, many of these political issues in the administration? Iraq has shown they don't.
yeah, they did the same thing in america, too. They were called "fancy maids" and they brought a price of 2500 dollars or so in New Orleans. They were mostly white. The mulatto slaves, many of whom appeared white, are a forgotten cause of the civil war. Read Tenzer's book about the forgotten cause of the civil war (tenzer has written several good essays that are posted on the Web--google it).   One huge cause of the civil war that the overclass has pushed aside is the fact that the whites in the north knew that more than 5 percent of all chattel slaves appeared white. And the northern whites also knew that many of the slaveowners wanted ALL labor to be owned by capital (see Tenzer's book). no one knows about all this now, but it was a raging controversy back then. The overclass that dominates american political and cultural ideology does not want this to come to light because having whites think of themselves as a privileged class helps the overclass escape progressive taxation like they have in europe.   
3 years is probably an estimate that takes into consideration that, by luck or design, many pipes will burst much later, and some much sooner.
Spoken by someone who doesn't know much about ZFS's features. XFS and EXT4 can't guarantee that you have a perfect copy of your data. (This is not a joke, as anyone who's experienced hardware problems on a fileserver knows.) Nor do they support snapshotting (copy-on-write), cloning (ditto), compression, mirrored volumes, striped volumes, RAIDZ (like RAID5, but you're not fucked if you lose power in the middle of a write), or intelligent reconstruction of failed volumes in mirror or RAIDZ disk sets (meaning they only reconstruct areas of the disk that actually had data written to them). The reason performance appears to be lacking is because every single block written to or read from a ZFS volume has to be checksummed to ensure consistency. If raw performance is the only concern, checksumming can be turned off, and should have been for this uninformed comparison. (Yes, I know that features like RAID and snapshots can be provided by volume managers, but not with the same ease-of-use or reliability. Also, consider that your hardware RAID controller doesn't know jack shit about what's supposed to be on your disks, so you only find out about a bad disk when it either dies, errors out enough for your OS to complain, or you start seeing mysterious data corruption. I have extensive experience with the first two options, and, fortunately, limited experience with the third.)

I agree. dailykos is kaos.
Maybe if they stopped using force for non-violent crime, using force wouldn't be bad if the suspect committed a violent act. However like that guy in New Orleans that tasered and beat down, that should never happen just fine him/ticket him.  If cops get violent over non violent offenses, that is a police state and it should be illegal.
It's in Detroit.
At least he got this part right: "On Solaris the zpool is created with three mirrors of two disks each."
&gt; She's not an extremist; rather quite easy going, but she prefers to wear a scarf. The question is: why? It's very probable that she wants to wear a scarf as an act of rebellion against the Christian/secular British society.
Chillingly beautiful.  Reminds me of *Marooned in Real Time*.
&gt;Israeli muslims have a lot more freedoms than Saudi, Afghani, Iraqi, Pakistani, or Somali Jews do... Israeli muslims have a lot more freedoms than *muslims* in those countries :S
That might make for an interesting sci-fi novel.
Candygram!
I have paintings and drawings of whites being sold at auction in early america in my video "homo sapiens americanus"   
I agree.
Does anybody know some benchmarks comparing a recent filesystem with one of the old ones? Has the years of research actually been that fruitful. Personally, I'd really like to see someone testing zfs vs. ext2 or ext4 vs. xiafs...
&gt;There is still a lot of money in the US treasury that needs to be put into private contractor's pockets. Big government bad, remember? Hmmmm - you know... that is a *very* interesting comment I have never though about.  Historically the Repubs have been against "big gov't" and the Dem's were all about "we can make it better for you" .... recently even a lot of the republicans have been turning to the fed for support.... ... Is it possible that these 2 terms have been specifically designed to reinforce the public's distrust in the federal government? And thus desire to decide things more locally?  Katrina conspiracy theories fall right into this model too - 911 theories not so good, but you can stuff them in (actually they fit well too).  The Federal Government has time and time again show itself systemically incapable of acting fast (aside from military units) or in the best interest of those they want to help -- yet why does EVERYONE turn to them the second something happens? ---hmmm.. sorry, went on a rant tangent there... forgive me please.
I don't know what an I-Pod is, but I've had my iPod for two years and I'm pretty damn happy with it.
So the guy holding his baby a few weeks who was tased and the baby fell on the floor suffering brain damage -- if there no tasers, he would have shot the guy while he was holding the baby waiting for the elevator? Bull shit.
This is absolutely disgusting and the people who ordered this and allow this should be hung.  I can't believe they kill little children.  Sons of bitches.
It was for those of us too lazy to read the article and instead skip right to the comments.  I actually read the article first, but to the OP, thx on behalf of those who didn't.
In fact I've been keeping a daily log of this sort for about 14 years, normally in emacs using plain text.  The nice thing about doing it in emacs is that since I'm proabably _already_ in emacs at any point where I want to add something, it's just a couple of keystrokes to switch between the log buffer and whatever I was working on. Over time I've evolved some simple formatting.  For example each document has the date at the top, in case the file gets moved/renamed accidentally.  Each file also has a list of all of the people mentioned (phone conversations, meetings, etc), using their full names in a consistently searchable manner.
Skin cancer dares to differ!  Vit D synthesis requires sunlight, ironically enough.   
Including this one, none.
"Keep in mind - the fact that the majority of us have highly specialized skills and are in a position to insult his intelligence doesn't mean that the world doesn't need people like him." Oh, we definitely need people like him...to make people like us laugh.
Zing!
I think the BEST thing about that is that Caltech wasn't even in the game
http://biblebrowser.com/leviticus/20-13.htm
Thank God for the art freaks. In the 1950s, Mendocino was falling apart, its tiny New England-style saltbox cottages decaying, the entire 19th-century fishing village nearly abandoned. Enter the bohemians, who fixed up the town and made it what it is today: a storybook village of rose-covered cottages, surrounded by white picket fences, on a rocky headland jutting into the icy-blue Pacific.
Has it ever been any different in our country's history?
Are those the only choices?
"that does not mean the White House is against dissent -- just so long as the president does not see it"
or even just __comments.strip() Disclaimer: IANAPP.  Is a double underscore at the beginning of a variable REALLY a convention, or is that just you?
Unfortunately you can only wish this isn't true but it is.  This is what goes on in Iraq.  Total slaughter of little innocent children along with any other innocent person.  If one shot comes from a neighborhood they are told to kill everyone.  This is genocide.  The people responsible should be hung for war crimes. Oh and they do use M16's and yes they are machine guns, they do 3 shot bursts.
I'm with you. Although it is sometimes necessary to detain people cops are way to nonchalant about it. Freedom is fundamental to the pursuit of happiness. Having been detained wrongly a few times (long stories that ended fairly well) I can say that nothing has upset me more. Being completely at the mercy of some ethically challenged, emotionally immature twit is terrifying.  A few pointers.  Never admit anything, it's easy- smart, savvy TV show   cops these folks ain't.  Ask to talk with the watch supervisor- they're usually on the ball. Always be polite!
I'm scared for life because I read reddit.
Yeah, those doctors just love causing pain. In fact, that's basically their job. Why else would they have all those nasty needles and scalpels? I no longer visit my family physician because he tried to torture me with a prostate exam. Never again!
Excellent!
I do not get the "Disillusionment" part of the article.
"ZFS is not yet ready." I love how you think you don't have to quantify that statement.
I thought it was "Sphincter?! I never touched her!"
Yeah, it's a tough call. Dumb cops engaged in entrapment vs. bigoted, hypocrite lawmaker. Sheesh. At the very least, I'm glad the two got an opportunity to interact.
You know... in every other industry, if consumers stop buying the product they take it as a signal that they need to change something about the product. And most other industries do - you don't see Dell bitching and moaning that sales of hard drives and motherboards are crippling their PC sales, for example. So any other industry might look at the situation and ask themselves: "How can we make albums a more compelling product for consumers so they'll keep buying them?". They could, for example, promote more artists who treat albums as a whole product rather than collection of tracks, such as was more common in the 60's and 70's before radio airplay became so critical. Or they could look to bundle more with albums, incorporating special features like those you'd find on a DVD. Or, as an alternative, they could figure out how to sell more singles to match the old revenues from albums - like by making them even easier and more convenient to buy than they already are. Instead, the recording industry acts like it's their god-given right that consumers should be out there buying $20 albums all the time, because by golly, that's their business model and consumers should adapt to that rather than the other way around. The difference between the RIAA (and NBC) and Apple/Steve Jobs is that Jobs wants to offer a product that *consumers actually want*. I don't know what NBC is smoking to think that anyone would pay $5 for *one episode* of their shows - but Jobs is absolutely right to tell them to go jump. Wal-Mart would do the same thing if they demanded $250 a DVD, as would any other retailer.
I will believe this when it's available and people can buy the car. 
Not so much, no.
Natural selection in action...
Uncle Sam to US population: Didn't I tell you to do as I *say*, not as I *do*?  Now pull down your pajama bottoms and not a word to your parents or I'll tell them about your pot stash.
Is this even real? Is it sourced anywhere? It could be a movie for all I know.
Heat?  Try lightning bolt.
Can you re-sell an unregistered car with no plates? Probably would be a month long process.
Replied.
Yeah, I'm sure these stick figure will be on exhibit at the Louvre 50 years from now.  Good thinking.
STOP SAYING IT. NOW I CAN'T GET IT OUT OF MY HEAD. ARGH.
REALLY?  I do eh? Carefull, this is from Apple's perspective, carefull when you read this: "Apple® today announced that it will not be selling NBC television shows for the upcoming television season on its online iTunes® Store (www.itunes.com). The move follows NBC’s decision to not renew its agreement with iTunes after Apple declined to pay more than double the wholesale price for each NBC TV episode, which would have resulted in the retail price to consumers increasing to $4.99 per episode from the current $1.99. ABC, CBS, FOX and The CW, along with more than 50 cable networks, are signed up to sell TV shows from their upcoming season on iTunes at $1.99 per episode" This language is tough to parse -- read it again if you must -- but its purpose is to obfucate and absolve Apple. 
The language can make the protocol transparent. Doesn't Erlang do something along these lines?
i am sincerely sorry that Tony is going to die from cancer. Much as I hate his kind I wouldn't wish that on another human. Still for his politics and the way he conducted his life... Second hand smoke. If you hate and lie and hook up with evil people your immune system has to suffer.
What?  No, you address the issue, but revenge is administered by the individual, I guess justice must be administered by someone outside of the victim.
the new GE also lets you apply your own textures to the terrain.  I was going to do this  for a flight seeing trip up in Denali national park but the res was already pretty awesome http://tinyurl.com/2njg99 my flight seeing pictures here:  http://reddit.com/info/2h0iq/comments if they combined image search with software like this it would be scary awesome http://research.microsoft.com/IVM/PhotoTours/
Another change I hadn't noticed before: &gt; PEP 3132: Extended Iterable Unpacking. You can now write things like `a, b, *rest = some_sequence`. And even `*rest, a = stuff`. The rest object is always a list; the right-hand side may be any iterable. Fantastic. I don't find any of the Py3k features particularly exciting, but all of these little improvements really add up.
Plus, it helps them target the ads - if you keep reloading the same page in quick succession, you start getting ads for OCD medication.
&gt; This incident reinforced my belief that Homeland Security has had success mostly in the area where the terrorists were really dumb. Such cases as the nitwit who tried to light his sneaker on fire on an airplane I don't think it was agents of DHS that busted Richard Reid initially. It was fellow passengers. IIRC. Which, by the point he was making, makes DHS look even "dumber."  &gt; I'm also becoming more aware of how many rights we have given up to this Administration. President Bush and his Department of Justice have argued that anyone, including a US citizen, can be arrested, placed in prison indefinitely, tortured and denied the right to know exactly with what he was being charged. I wonder what stood between me and an all expense paid trip Abu Ghraib. I know this sounds melodramatic but this is only because we have put blinders on regarding what this Bush administration is doing to this country under the guise of the war on terrorism. Heh. Some of us have never put blinders on. At this stage in the game, this sounds like something written by a very establishment- and authority-friendly guy ("ex-cop of 29 years") who probably supported Bush whole-heartedly in 2000 and with reservations in 2004 and is just now coming to the realization that the foundations of law and justice he thought he was standing on are essentially worthless, thanks to the administration he helped elect. Also, I'm not sure I can really believe any more that things like detaining this guy are "errors" due to "incompetence" rather than malice. I think at their heart, some of these policies are intended to cow people, keep them divided, and keep them afraid of both terrorists *and* arrest by the state. I think the vision the administration has is one of the stupid, uninformed, helpless people being led/manipulated and protected/controlled by a small group of leaders and their minions. Compared to most citizens' views of what this country is and how it should operate, that vision *is* malicious to some extent.
Tasers are tools for lazy cops who can't think beyond conflict. And believe me, they'd much rather just use a regular gun, but there's too much paperwork after a police shooting.
Perhaps Apple should reduce its non-value-addded markeup and continue to make their revenue? I suspect Apple is trying to send a message to the producers.  The message is "We set the wholesale price.  We set the retail price.  if you dont like them.  We take our customers and lock you out". Which is exactly what has happened.
Parented. No, wait...
TENORI-ONの開発風景。  イギリスで発売されたけど、日本はいつ頃なんだろう？
Many of the pigs testing other methods died, and the pigs that survive will be destroyed after the procedure.  That's just standard procedure with this kind of testing, they don't want any past testing to "contaminate" the results of future testing, and these animals are probably lumped in with others that undergo testing that leaves them potentially toxic.  All animals that come out of any tests at the facility are almost certainly incinerated. That said, this kind of testing is completely justified.  This technology will save many lives in the military, and will eventually make it to civilian emergency response.
Hubbie better stick close, I don't think those garments will help you float.
ahahaa wow I never noticed th STOP POSTING STUPID SHIT
he survived, eh?  haha. Personally, I am a coward. Id rather die then do more than 1yr in prison.
Not only that it is perfectly legal most places.
To play devil's advocate, up to the point where he was arrested he doesn't seem to have done anything more than be a nuisance.  I mean wouldn't there have to have been a conversation about transaction in order for all doubt to have been removed.  Doesn't seem like much of a slam dunk but they arrested him for lewd behavior, seemed more like possible lewd behavior, but there isn't a law against being sketchy, is there.
Agree whole heartedly. We were offered formula by the hospital on three separate occasions before our daughter was born. She was fed formula at the hospital after birth and it was offered to us twice more after the birth. After the birth, we [received disguised marketing surveys](http://www.hipmama.com/node/671) tuned to determine the effectiveness of the hospital marketing. We had a very hard time getting our daughter to the  breast because of nipple confusion caused by the formula feedings, which it turns out were completely unnecessary. The hospitals are being very two-faced encouraging breastfeeding verbally yet performing actions that are proven, [ironically by the formula company's own survey results](http://abbottnutrition.com/resources/en-US/news_and_media/media_center/BF_Trends_2003.pdf), make it harder for the mother to breast feed. **Edit:** I'm probably coming down too hard on the companies. Bravo to New York for recently banning them from the hospitals. Other social norms need to be changed to encourage breastfeeding also--like extended leave and acceptance of feeding in public.
Unfortunately, this particular economic theory seems to fita  particularly evil agenda of some very evil people particularly well.
This is completely fake.  These pics are all on her MySpace page ... see 'Wendy' ... what completely moronic hogwash.  found camera ... right.  And the British press was suckered in.  Yooohaaa! http://profile.myspace.com/index.cfm?fuseaction=user.viewprofile&amp;friendid=207848259
I don't need any legs to do *my* job.
I know.  They should have been watching Die Hard.
&gt; Do you think those things are incompatible with human civilization? I hope not.  But but trying to think from the perspective of someone who did think that: if they are incompatible then humanity is doomed anyway because we depend on the biosphere, so either a) humanity takes the biosphere down with it or b) humanity goes down first, allowing the biosphere to recover and eventually thrive. I think human civilization is capable of adapting itself to have a sustainable relationship with nature.  But things will probably have to get worse before we get better.
A probabilistic algorithm is not at all the same thing as a randomized algorithm.
COOOL
That would all be delightful. Except you can buy a DVD of a full season of Heroes (for instance), 23 episodes, plus Bonus Features and Extras.  Physical Media, and distribution for $32.  Remember, that includes a markup for the retailer. The same product, at Apple's retail store is $46. Your not suggesting that digital distribution is MORE expensive than Pysical distribution?  never mind the *extra features*.    Do you see a problem here?  Lets presume NBC only wanted $1.39 per movie wholesale ($32 DVD / 23 Episodes).  Apple could make $0.70 per episode without raising the retail price. Do you think that NBC would want *MORE* money for a product that costs *SUBSTANTIALLY* less for them to manufacture??? Perhaps, Apple has an insane markup, and wants to keep it? And is trying to fcuk over NBC by tossing them out of the Apple-Walled-Garden?
LEAVE these people alone, they just want to be fucking happy - when the hell did that became a threat to society take you heads out of your asses
does anyone else find that the guy who prematurely burned the burning man and then charged with arson really stupid? seriously, he was just fulfilling it's final purpose anyways, what's the problem here?
Link-jacked, mod down please.
Metamucil?  Its available at Walgreens...
I'm guessing that Apple doesn't want to introduce a different price for different shows model.  That would be a slippery slope towards different prices for hit songs which I believe the music studios have been pitching for a long time. iTunes is simple.  If people have to make a price decision every time they look at an episode, then they will start to wonder whether they should be buying episodes at all.
This is a load of shit. Schäuble is a fucking idiot and says one preposterous thing after the next. No one actually pays attention to him other than news sites looking for great headlines. He's a tard, and thankfully has no real power.
Why is it broken by the way?  I've never noticed any problems. I have wondered if reload is thread safe ... or what that even means with respect to reload.  Maybe that's how it's broken?
Laziness is a philosophy.
  &gt; Really? Running a couple of ads encouraging breastfeeding  I think you missed where the conversation went from running advertisements to not letting women use formula to feed their babies to make sure they breastfeed.
Well. A lowly populated city like Coppell, Texas, where I lived, had FiOS in EVERY HOME, plus, every other city in Dallas County. But, highly populated areas, like New Jersey, where I live now, dont have FiOS.  WTF? Long Island has it, but not New Jersey??
Good to see who all the twentieth level women are in this setting.
42
when you see "venture capital" and "paradigm shift" in the same article, usually indicates 100% bullshit. They are talking about molecular capacitors, which existed forever. There is a schematic in Russian "Radio" (circa 1989) magazine for electronics geeks how to make a bicycle driven by a molecular capacitor. Capacitor was about 40 cm in diameter and 20 cm height, and was able to drive that bike 200 meters with 70kg person on it. They also mentioned if you short it it will blow the short, and if it can't, electorlyte will boil and explode, possibly making you a competitor to Goatse.
It's the same one. It's the same war the delusional nuts from PNAC (Project for a New American Century) have been wanting for years. You know, the same delusional nuts that got us into the other war they wanted, the Iraq war (with the help of delusional Americans). .   From PNAC:  "Over the long term, Iran may well prove as large a threat to U.S. interests in the Gulf as Iraq has. And even should U.S.-Iranian relations improve, retaining forward-based forces in the region would still be an essential element in U.S. security strategy given the longstanding American interests in the region."  Interpretation: Secure the the oil at all costs. Although PNAC denies it wants America to be an empire, it is exactly what it advocates.   .  Take a look at PNAC's association with the Bush administration; it's an eye opener. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Project_for_the_New_American_Century     edit:clarity
Ahh - but the thing Apple has going for it is that it **IS** a proprietary format.  That makes it easier to protect with DRM.   You use an iPod, you *have* to use a protected format - use a Zune - hell free content works just as well, why pay?  Are you saying someone can create an iPod clone except only locked into a **new** service where they would have to repurchase everything they currently have?  It won't happen now - the window is closed, iPod is unsurmountable in the current market model. Good God man, I only replace the vinyl I have when it is no longer playable - I skipped 8-Track and Cassette on most of them - that is unless I self dub them onto the new format - which **NOW** is apparently illegal. But what GE, Vivendi, et.al. need to come up with is a pricing plan to make the hassle of piracy not worth the time - and to date that seems to be one of the biggest sticking points - singles vs albums (they make their money on the album - not the single - under current model - except "Best Of") When CDs were released at $16 per there was outrage.  The Industry *promised* they would become cheaper as the technology matured.  They were right on both grounds - the tech became MUCH cheaper and the CDs *are* cheaper - but only because of inflation - $16 today does not match $16 then and the tech price fell a LOT faster than inflation rose - basically, inflation was just an increase to margins. They are the fools who went digital thinking that NO one would be able to get a decent copy just because the public had no easy way to replicate LPs (and at the time, rightly so).  No one had the tech foresight that as the world went digital, theoretical lossless reproduction could be digitally done - let alone that most ears can't tell the difference between lossless and lossy (unless it's REALLY bad).
Yeah, I really like how they're making the most of this one opportunity to break backwards compatibility. Loads of small improvements that haven't been possible in previous releases.
He may have been directing his statement to all of the redditors who had already posted, rather than to a particular statement.
This is pretty much the same thing you sign when you send your kid to summer camp too..
[Toonces makes me laugh again!](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=6649425647190160549)
LMAO! You made my bongload shoot out my nose!
Yeah, but I want to try to understand *how*. In what way would your life change, exactly?
fuck you lol 
He probably would have been manhandled, and the baby still dropped or injured in the scuffle.
Oh the horror!!! Thats the best comment on Reddit in weeks...
Huh. Thanks. Well, I was only 80% wrong.
Naked people is not porn.
*its* final purpose
Here is a system that is even faster than five minutes: Car drives up to refueling status. Driver pushes button, empty battery drops in collecting facility, fresh battery is pushed backed into car. Driver gets a cup of coffee - two minutes later, drives off.   
&gt; The law might make it illegal for you to sleep with a 17 year old girl That might be the case in some backwards third world countries, in Europe it is perfectly fine, and very common.
Yeah, the way it looks, it's either a prediction or wishful thinking or both.
indeed, horrid grammar, horrid. thank you sir.
Now don't get me wrong, I'm pretty much in favor of equipping the police with tasers, but this "Nonlethal weapon" crap needs to stop. Tasers can kill, and even if they do not kill, they can cause severe permanent damage. __A taser is not a non-lethal weapon__. If the people who carry those weapons get that through their heads, and are properly trained on how to use those things and _when_ to use them - as the last possible measure before the gun - then shit like the baby dropping guy would not happen, or at least happen less. (And don't get me started on giving average joes/janes those things for carrying around. "But he _looked_ scary, and anyways, those are NONLETHAL!11!")
I enjoy my work.
None of statements, figures or so-called "facts" on this website are cited.
I'm the postmaster.
I completely thought that was real.
Not to mention that being this particular president's press secretary is probably extremely stressful. I'm sure the extra stress can't be good for even the healthiest of people, let alone someone with cancer.
A little correction: French revolution is 1789, not 1794.
I have no idea how this kind of crap ("don't feed them but shoot them!") goes along with outcries against Bush's violations of human rights in the same website and gets voted *up*... Do you play **that** much WoW?
Wow you totally missed my point. Save the earth from pointless carbon monoxide emissions, go die. :)
I expect I will not convince you, but one more try... &gt; That "known range" is the probability that the answer is correct. That's what I was talking about. Wrong.  That "known range" is the error in the answer.  e.g. in the traveling-salesman problem, there could be an algorithm that always finds a path within a factor of 2 of the shortest path. As for randomized algorithms, I will offend all internet protocol and admit that I got my knowledge from reading a book.  (Heresy, I know.)  Namely, "Randomized Algorithms" by Motwani and Raghavan.  A randomized algorithm is either * Finds the *exact* solution in an amount of time that is usually low.  (Known as a "las vegas" algorithm) * Finds a solution, which is *exact* with some known probability.  (A "monte carlo" algorithm)
And everyone says the US is turning into a Fascist state. The UK is a heck of a lot further along.
You would get more benefit by clothing yourself head to toe in white to reflect the sun.
Wow. Id love to have this guy as a body guard.
Sorry, but how else you do write extremely large systems, or generally systems that can scale? I think the goal of SOA is to separate the system into pieces (where each piece might be a fleet of machines), so that you can load balance and, importantly, increase the throughtput of that piece.  What's the alternative? Real distributed systems (like Erlang) work for some problems but not others -- it is hard to give high reliability to any given request, or to bound maximum request time. Let's say you're writing an ecommerce application that deals with an extremely large catalog (like, say, Amazon.com's).  How do you divide the "business concerns" of your application into multiple, individually scalable pieces without SOA? Here are some examples of services that might need to be talked to during the display of a *single web page* during a customer's session:   * Fetching final price information of the item * Contacting fulfillment centers to determine which to use and delivery ETA * Sending an email to the customer notifying them of the order *  Updating inventory to note the lack of the item *  Aggregating sales info to figure out what items to stock in the future *  Recording metrics about who buys what items *  Determining what advertising to show on each pages *  ... and more  All of these things should properly be their own service (perhaps with its own database), so that they can each scale as necessary.  Since it's a service, if one fleet goes down, your load balancer can fail-over to another datacenter.  Teams can work independently with their own budget, equipment, and technologies (languages), isolated by the communications layer.  This strong isolation prevents certain errors from propagating across systems (if you call an API, it can return an error, but that's it -- it can't crash your app like it could if this was a procedure call).  Teams can update their code in realtime, allowing for short release cycles and fast bugfixes.  Data is protected (CC#s) because the data owners control access conditions strictly through their service logic (there is no other way to get to the data). Are you advocating that you compile this all into one monolithic application that runs on the webserver and talks directly to all relevant databases?  What's the alternative to SOA that everyone seems to be implying?
&gt;I'm not excusing men looking for love in all the wrong places, but no one seems bothered or even interested that Craig might have been entrapped; that there might have be something wrong with the police using a cute blonde cop as bait. Craig wasn't looking for love, he was looking for sex.  As it turns out that bathroom had been a good place to look for sex, hence the cop.  Odd to think they needed a supposedly cute cop to hide in a closed stall.
As the cohorts in the Administration get older and near death, as Snow brushed with Cancer recently, the guilt of being part of the War Propaganda Machine weighs heavy, as it did with Ashcroft. And all the King's Horses, and all the King's Men, couldn't put the War Machine back together again.
Yes, while I'm sure they KNOW porn is bringing them traffic there are legal reasons why you don't moderate content proactively.  It kills some of your legal protection.
someone has too much time on their hands...wish i had thought of this...
Yeah, $5 is too much for a TV show.  But my point is that the title is inaccurate* "iTunes Store To Stop Selling NBC Television Shows -- NBC wants $4.99/episode" That is wrong.  *Apple* "wants" $5.  NBC is not obligated to set a wholesale price that makes Apple's markup feasible.  Apple's PR implies that NBC chose the *retail* price, this is not the case.  NBC chose the wholesale price, and *Apple* unilaterally mandated a price that the market will not bear.  Apple had every ability to reduce its markup to meet a price reasonable for the market. If Amazon can sell Heroes at $1.32 per episode, Im sure Apple can make some money too if the product is still priced at $2.00 via Itunes. *Damn reddit, allow us to edit the titles.
This website features pictures of vaginae[Firefox sic].
I see.  I guess  in my opinion society is taking "revenge" on the perpetrator.  Maybe revenge isn't the word I'm thinking then.
cool clothes br 
Let me put it this way. Those Universal DRM-free tracks that are being sold? I thought I might buy some. I went to try finding them. Okay... so we've got gBox which appears to want me to tell other people to buy the tracks for me and Real who want me to take out a subscription. Walmart appeared closest to useful, as they actually would sell me directly an MP3, but with no way of easily finding what artists they had as MP3, or ideally which artists I'd bought iTunes music from and they had as MP3, I eventually just gave up. And now NBC is about to make an equally dumb move involving video. If they launch a service that is as good as iTunes, except without Apple taking a share, I'll be back with my words and the ketchup, but I can't see it happening. 
TY - apparently the friggen meds are beginning to work - never noticed.  Phewww.  Forgive me for not checking seriously... though I am sure that if I found it now.. I would have the same problem. Woohoo! I think I am to the point that someone needs to point me to something to obsess about!  I'm so happy...  DAMNIT! - this friggen thread is gonna run through my head all night!
are you kidding me? you can't use synaptic for everything you know.  http://earth.google.com/tour/thanks-linux4.html then do this cd Desktop;  sudo chmod a+rwx GoogleEarthLinux.bin;  sudo ./GoogleEarthLinux.bin;
How many songs you got on that there iPod? (cute with the small "i" by the way -- Apple's so dang clever!)
oh all right
I think they're overdue. The other day I had opportunity to visit a high school, and was surprised that, other than the lack of Starter jackets, the kids were wearing exactly what was in fasion back when I was in school, 15 years ago. *sigh* Kids these days, just not rebellious enough...
A friend brought this up today, and it's actually a great point. Is it a law that you can't ask people for sex? And if so, isn't that kind of a freedom of speech issue?
I'm guessing it does you no good, but slime's completion functionality in Emacs is perhaps the most advanced I've seen for any tool/language combination.  Of course, you're probably not writing Lisp.   JDE mode offers completion along the same lines as other Java IDE's (running beanshell in the background to parse the buffer as you type and offer context-sensitive completion.)  In my limited dealings with Java, it doesn't seem to be as good as things like Eclipse, for example becoming confused by line breaks in certain places.  Regardless, I doubt that the overlap between Emacs users and Java programmers is particularly large, anyway. Really, I think it comes down to this.  You almost have to have accidentally become an emacs/vi user to really appreciate the tools.  If you try to pick it up later, you don't know how to do the really advanced stuff that make the tools so good, so they seem pointlessly complex.  If you learned one or both when you had no other viable options, you were forced to stick with them long enough to see the light.  I wouldn't trade emacs for Eclipse and $1000, but I'd have a hard time convincing an intelligent person who's never used either that I'm not insane.
Anyone else notice the not-so-hidden parallels with religion? This is basically the garden of eden fantasy with Adam and Eve removed.
How do you expect them to figure it out..?
15 million dollars a year for the ACS advertising budget? That aint nearly enuf to make a dent in the american culture that has been evolved by big money to fight against national healthcare.
"Garcher, your prank was hilarious. The planning was well thought out. The execution was perfect. But... the music in your Youtube video is terrible. We're going to have to suspend you."
Fixed link: http://www.leftinthewest.com/showDiary.do?diaryId=918
I'd be gutted to find out that I had been born with 2 dicks, only to have one removed! (Yeah, I know this story ain't that simple. I hope the child does survive to grow up, as he appears he has a heart disorder too).
yeah like these guys will sign over their oil wells to private foreign companies hmm sounds a lot like No Child Left Behind - keep lowering the standards to meet the needs of lazy kids and parents
I.d.i.o.t.
About 800, which is the extent of my library at the moment.
Well honestly the morale situation in the military is pretty bad right now. This is normal military reaction to those kinds of issues.
Linkjacked, this was on NPR yesterday. http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=14060804
&gt; Are you ACTUALLY attempting to compare A)forcing women to endure pregnancy for months followed by the act of labor, with B)not letting them use formula for a few days until their body has had a chance to start naturally producing milk? Yeah, "bucko," I am.  &gt; Why don't you just compare me to a nazi while you're at it and complete the cycle of hyperbole? Because the first to bring up Nazis loses.  Congratulations. Look, obviously you think enforcing laws on women's bodies is okay if it's for society's benefit.  I can understand how it would make you uncomfortable for someone to paint your desires in those terms, but them's the breaks.  Have fun. &gt; And beyond that, you know what... we already force parents to do a hell of a lot in the name of not screwing up their kid. Parents need to get their kids to school; they don't need to drive them there in a hybrid or make sure their kids are wearing designer sweatshop-free clothes or keep them out of McDonald's or give them iPods or feed them only organic food.  Or whatever the latest fad is among the yuppies. &gt; Our legal system specifically places the needs of the child BEFORE the needs of the parents if they ever come into direct conflict. That's LIFE. You don't know what you're talking about. And if you place your kids needs ahead of your needs, you've already failed as a parent.
Right, he wasn't having sex in the bathroom, which is against the law.  At best he was propositioning, which shouldn't be against the law.  If someone wasn't interested it would have been obvious.  If they were, as the cop pretended to be, then so what.  Two adults move along to do their business.  As long as no money transaction then no laws broken.
I don't work at a SOA shop, my high-high level understanding is this; back in the day, users could interface with various applications if they needed to by building applications around a database.  Typically these include C/asm/cobol based applications, with varying interfaces.  The important aspect was the database.  This became cumbersome because desktop applications were difficult to deploy and typically the interface to these databases were through vendor specific drivers and/or complicated mainframe/cics interfaces. Then comes CORBA.  CORBA attempts to resolve the issue by using a client-server architecture where applications of different applications and platforms could talk to each other.  Then comes web-interfaces to database.  So in a sense, we went backwards and kind of used vendor specific connectors.  But odbc, jdbc, and whatever else made things a little easier.  J2EE and the EJB spec were supposed to be the successor to CORBA/RMI (I guess?) but as reddit will tell you, didn't turn out so well. So that brings us to the year 2007 and my question.  And this where I am kind of confused, I am still in a web 1.0 world.  People seem to like Ajax and REST oriented architectures (yahoo[flickr], google, to name a few).   For example, yahoo flickr's rest api seems to be pretty powerful.  Google has that powerful google-map api.  What does SOA and SOAP give that a simple REST architecture not give?  Or can a SOA be composed of a REST architecture.
"an I'd hit it from someone?"
When my dad was at Auburn, Georgia Tech was a big game.  One year, they greased the train tracks so that the train the GA Tech team was on couldn't stop at the Auburn depot, but kept sliding for a mile or two.  In those days that was just good fun. Now it would get you sent to prison.  Sigh.
It is the idea that makes "fair trials" fair, and the opposite idea barbaric. It is not a matter of efficiency or a matter of being the best option, but a matter of what are the underlying ideals that create the concepts.
You have. Votes that get positive replies get more points. I'm doing my part as well here.
What may be hard for us to see is that if an outside anthropologist were to look at our culture, we have our own gender roles that could be equally striking.
Please die.
You know, you can put thousands and thousands a songs on them there iPods. Just thousands of 'em! Ok well thanks for responding intelligently to my ripping on a company that pisses me off. I have a shuffle in fact which I've used for running *after* I bought new headphones that wouldn't fly out my ears.  Do you run, by any chance?
Barium Titanate eh? Hmm, that was one of the dielectrics tested during Brown's research on electrogravitics and the biefield-brown effect.
No - I've noticed it's the other way round. I've noticed that letting experience come first leads to less fuckups.
This is interesting activity in the Middle-east given Bush &amp; Co's recent Iran war rhetoric. I think if the US strikes Iran, there will be a terrible regional war dragging in Hezbollah, Syria and Israel, etc, etc... Let's hope this war does not come to fruition.
goatse hasn't worked for years
&gt; I would have found this more interesting without the thinly veiled social commentary. Considering the source website, this isn't exactly "thinly veiled", it is the status quo. I recognized the picture from earlier Reddit articles, the author is [Super Dood](http://www.healthranger.org/)! He doesn't eat read meat (i.e. He discriminates based on color. Food racist!)
Yea, that was it.  I had trouble downloading the binary and running it. http://groups.google.com/group/earth-linux/topics Look at all of graphics driver issues. "Same hang problem here, Dell Inspiron 6000 w/ X300 Mobility, Fedora 7  with all updates, ATI driver 8.40.4 and kernel 2.6.22-4.65. The ATI  driver was installed by download from the AMD driver page. Initially,  I had the same hang at splash screen problem, but put the older  libGL.so.1 in the google earth install folder, and it works fine"
If you hadn't told me it was the Russian counter-terrorism unit, I would of guessed it was them It's just such a Russian way of going about things   
Sorry about the previous post about this ship being "close to Iran". Whoever mentioned that mistake is definitely right that I editorialized the headline improperly.
How in the hell do either of you know what's REALLY going on in Iraq?
pinch a loaf!
I wish the [content filter](http://userscripts.org/scripts/show/8751?dupe=with_style) could be used to hide these stories.  Unfortunately, if an article says "OMFG we're going to invade Iran soon, AND HERE'S SOLID EVIDENCE", that's one I'd actually want to read. I wish Reddit had a feature where if one of the people on my friends list indicated a story had no factual basis whatsever, that a story is just hearsay and conjecture, that Reddit would hide those stories from my view.  Too bad reddit [isn't open-sourced yet](http://programming.reddit.com/info/23k8o/comments/c23luk).
and other automated propaganda machinery
The West has been at war with Iraq for a while now, long before the present Bush.  The bombing and sanctions were causing lots of suffering.  The Iran - Iraq war was even more horrific and we certaily played a part in keeping that conflict going.
Just going to Iraq is no reason to castigate Katie. Looking like a freaky little leprechaun, on the other hand...
Uninformed question about the P?NP problem, from an uninformed person: If there are a known number of variables, wouldn't there have to be a known number of combinations? I've seen locks with 4 tumblers, each with 0-9 numbering.  Simple math would indicate that there are 10^4, or 10,000 possible combinations.  Although I've never seen he same style lock with 100 tumblers, or with 100 different positions on each tumbler, the principle would still apply, no? that would give 100^100 , or 1E+102 combinations, but still a discrete number of combos.  What am I missing?  The fact that we can't count the stars in the sky, or the number of prime numbers?   
They may have 'inherited' homophobia but they certainly did their share to cultivate and perpetuate it as well.
Now I'm all self conscious about my wide stance too.
Double-standards Deacon, double-standards. That ought to be a sin.
It is possible to accelerate your hard disk drive to speed up file transfer. It has been tested and proven to save you 15-25 seconds in copying a 700 megabyte file on the same physical hard-drive compared to normal Windows file copy method. The bigger the file you copy, the more time you save. Here's how to accelerate your HDD to speed up transfer.
Very useful iframe tricks.
Or give up meat entirely. [Meet your Meat](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-513747926833909134) [Earthlings](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GhxKnys7Ryw)
I found the 4x magnification oddly erotic. 
MAH PEEPLES NEEEDS AHS REPAHRATIONS!!!!
coming soon, another "lets take back our country on some date" website.
&gt;the Republicans' willingness to contemplate a nuclear Armageddon in the Middle East is hardly surprising, coming from a party effectively in the grip of deranged "born-again" dispensationalists – for whom rumors of nuclear war are part and parcel of the "good news" that Christ is returning. Hmm.. last I checked, the fundies still needed the temple to be rebuilt on the mount before Armageddon happens- kinda hard to do when the entire region is a sheet of radioactive glass. Also I would not call it a "Republican" position - "Religious Right" sure, but not "Republican" -- turning the mid-east into a sheet would of glass contains God/Allah knows how many rotegens/rads/rems would be released trying to retrieve any fossil fuels beneath it - Repubs do not want that - hell the fundies would prefer NOT to have mutants working on the new temple either. No, anyone - including a candidate or the current head of state (any state) *even contemplating* nuclear first strike should **immediately** be removed from the authorization chain. I hate to say it, but the MAD strategy not only worked, it made sense (in a sick sort of way - at least I never had the "duck and cover" drills)
I read the article.  It is you, not the article, that is wrong.  You said: &gt; That "known range" is the probability that the answer is correct. That's what I was talking about. This, my internet friend, shows that you do not know what you are talking about.  Since you ignored my detailed explanation, I should assume you aren't interested in learning.
no, you forgot, he's never leaving office.
No, of course not.
Fear leads to the Dark Side...
&gt;Keywords: i am [a] woman  &gt;Words: 4 Female Score: 0 Male Score: 6  &gt;The Gender Genie thinks the author of this passage is: male! We've got an intricate paradox here!
Why should Apple reduce their marginal profit just because NBC wants to increase their wholesale price?
God your stupid.  With a brain as dull as yours, please do not drive or operate heavy machinery.
Arabic, Aramaic, and Hebrew are all cousin languages. Assumming Pipes' claim, then it follows that learning Hebrew would have qualitatively the same effect. 
No, it's not a fact that the United States of America uses NAZI symbols.  Lap up the propaganda of a dictator who suppresses his people through violence.
I believe the theory is that "Iran is supporting the insurgency in Iraq" Therefore decapitating Iran serves two purposes.  One it means we don't have to work as hard in Iraq since we won't be dealing with Imported Iranian roadside bombs (Iran going down will serve to make any other supporters think twice about those actions, remember lybia after Iraq fell).   The second rule of thinking is that if we just pull out of Iraq, Iran wins.  It's like going into a country, shedding blood and treasure then giving it to your sworn enemy.   If the mullahs in Iran are deposed then we can pull out and while there may be anarchy for a bit, there won't be Iran gaining power in the region.    We don't necessarily have to invade iran, we just have to destabilize it enough to unseat the leadership and send their nuclear aspirations back to the stone age.  That may be a sustained bombing campaign or it may be a small, highly targeted ground invasion.  It doesn't have to be large or expensive. Amazingly enough, Iran has pissed off Europe enough that we might actually have the support of the EU this time especially with the new Prime Minister in France.  Remember Europe was busy scolding the US for being cowboys so we told them to deal with Iran and show it how it was done and Iran basically schooled the UE -- publicly.  And Europeans have just enough testosterone left (thanks mainly to the new eastern additions) that they're a bit peeved about that. We're probably at this point now (late I might add) because while Iran did a pretty good job of keeping the oilfields off-line in Iraq (insurgency), we probably have things in hand well enough now to move into Iran without decimating the global oil-supply.  In addition to iraq's fields, the world powers have stockpiled enough oil to survive a period of instability, if you remember the massive oil price spikes in the last year or so, you may also recall that none of the major powers stopped purchasing oil for their strategic reserves.  So you can't really say all this was unexpected. While I doubt it will please reddit overly much, those of us who remember the Iranian hostage crisis and have followed Iran's deadly influence on the world stage since won't be shedding many tears when the mullahs finally are deposed. 
Here you go: http://exitstage-left.blogspot.com/2007/07/republican-sexual-deviants.html http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Roman_Catholic_sex_abuse_cases Enjoy.
If you read further in the same paragraph, it implies that women are "the opposite sex" to the OP.
Who said anything about apologizing you dolt.  Showing some kind of disapprobation when some atrocity is committed *in* *your* *name* would suffice.  Dancing in the street to celebrate however is *not* OK (as could be frequently seen amongst 'moderate' muslims in places where they feel numerous enough not to hide their true feelings -- or where they know the local media won't dare offending them, e.g., Europe). Anyway,  I recognized you! here you are:  http://www.jihadwatch.org/archives/017036.php 
Should we round up the lions to finish you off later?
Who reads this crap?  Nobody "attacked" anybody and nobody "grew hysterical".
whew, so relieved that wasn't MY resume.
That's a recording, not a transcript. Not linkjacked. Furthermore, this blog did their own transcript (it differs in several places from the official NPR transcript you have to pay to view).  Who cares anyway? None of us would have found this and read it if this blog didn't post their own transcript. As long as the author is properly credited (which he is) and the content is there, I'm happy.
That is one of the coolest concept I heard about lately; Nuke-Moding!
Retail adds no value.  Apple is tossing out producers who refuse to cut the lions-share of retail revenue to them. This $5 talk is BS.  No other retail business *refuses* to sell a product (that is non-substitutable) because they want to keep high profit-margins. If you buy the DVD of Heroes at retail (Target, Amazon, Best Buy) it costs $32 for 23 episodes, or $1.32 per episode. Being that the Digital Download product is *cheaper* for NBC to produce, can we presume that the price is less than $1.32 per episode? Lets guess that it is $1.32 in fact.  That makes $0.62 per episode profit for the retailer. If NBC wanted to triple (it doesnt, it wants to "more than double"), then the new wholesale price would be $3.96.  The new profit at retail would be $1.04. That is _more_ than the $0.62 made at the old retail price. What does this say to me?  That Apple wants to maintain a fixed profit margin as the wholesale price increases, and refuses to allow more of the retail price to goto the _producer_ of the product. Why would they deserve this?  The retailer -- especially a Digital Download retailer who has less overhead and cost -- adds no value.  Why should they command the lions share of the retail price? Presently, retail is $2.00.  Now, NBC says "we want more than twice the price".  Apple says "Oh, we'd have to charge $5.00" -- because they want to keep up a fixed markup. I hope NBC tells us the wholesale price, because I can assure you, this attempt to throw NBC under-the-bus will blow up in Apple's face if we know what kind of ridiculous retail mark-up Apple is getting for doing virtually nothing. 
Yes.  The benefits you mention are specific to Service Oriented Architectures, and dont often come from Procedural Programming.  The difference is in the isolation level.
Should soldiers be allowed to vote in the next election? If the answer is yes (and it is), then why are they not allowed to inform themselves on the issues and candidates. And no, they can't just do it on their off-time. They have less off-time than most of us.
I'm somewhat surprised that Apple released an actual press release over this issue. Oh, and congrats NBC for effectively shooting yourself in the foot. Now all the people who used to pay for your shows through iTunes will just use bittorrent. Also, to those who are declaring this to be Apple's fault for not wanting to be flexible on the retail price - from all I've read, Apple makes hardly any profit at all on every music track sold, at most, a dime per episode. So, I'd assume that if Apple is using the same model for their television contracts, they're making about 20 cents of profit on every tv episode sold. It's hardly worth Apple's while to cut their profit when they hardly make any profit as it is. Apple makes its real money from iPod sales, not iTunes sales.
Most hostage takers aren't so stupid as to sit out on a window like that and expose themselves. Had that been in the US snipers would have wasted that guy.
220 over how long of a period?  If that's in the past 5 years we're talking about 44 a year.   How does that compare prior? Have there been less officers and suspects killed? I  suspect this article doesn't tell everything we need to know.
Pretty cool, but I wish the author had pitch-shifted the gwen stefani song up.
&gt; Communism is an economic theory... It is more than a *theory* - in fact, the very word theory gives it a scientific legitimacy that it lacks. It is either a model for a society or a state, or a particular historical implementation thereof. Capitalism is more an observational finding - it is what was observed to happen, unlike communism, which predicts what will, or should, happen.
truly an excellent observation and point.
I (un)fortunately am on this overlap, and find JDE a little rough on the edges too. The project also looks dead... I wish it could be better so I could live all the time in emacs, but lacking the time and skills to bring it up to par I guess I will continue splitting my time between Emacs/Eclipse for some time still... One funny thing I remembered was when I was chosing an editor to specialize in, like Pragmatic Programmers recommend. So I made the mistake to go asking around my workplace at the time (java only shop) which editor people used and what do they thought about the big two. EVERY ONE mocked Emacs/VI, with comments like: "Yeah I tried it once but gave up when you had to press CTRL + SHIFT + ALT @# E to go to the end of line..." Suspecting something was wrong, after all emacs would not have such a huge following if there was no substance behind it, I tried emacs and the rest is history...
Man oh man, she has got a beautiful pair of gloves on her.
No kidding. Ginger kids! :P
*Permitted*?  Is there a law that *forbids* that?  Or you are referring to an unspoken laws of Christian "decency?"
New Jersey is too easy to mock. I'd feel like a jerk for making fun of it.
Besides the obvious spelling error, you could have included  -python -forum -mailing Ie ruby multine regular expressions -python -forum -mailing does exactly what you wanted it too, spelling mistakes and all. Alternatively, you can make a fool of yourself by posting how "google sucks" on reddit. Learn your tools.
That's what the article says: "Foley and Haggard and Craig did not create the homophobia that they espouse, they inherited it". 'Espouse' means to "take up the cause, ideology, practice, method, of someone and use it as one's own" (Source: WordNet - Princeton University).
One example of improper usage doesn't provide conclusive evidence that all tazer usage was bad.
Do you suppose that whenever someone on *Star Trek* uses the replicator to make a chocolate cake they have to pay the original chef a few bucks for the digital rights to the recipe?  I think the chef probably just makes recipes because he enjoys doing it. Sorry music industry.  It's over.  Forever.    
&gt;No, the movie is an attempt to bring the reality of a particular crime in Iraq to the crowd at the Venice film festival . . . and eventually some American people. Fair enough, but I don't think DePalma's point was to provide a snapshot of daily life in Iraq. His greater point is that war and foreign occupation are dehumanizing and unspeakably brutal propositions. It's not the simple "we're good, they're evil" narrative that this administration insists on hammering into us. It's easy to support war/occupation if you are never exposed to the reality of it all. One wonders how much support ANY war would have if the population got to see its horrors in vivid detail.
The insinuation is that he was propositioning someone to have sex in the bathroom.  (Although asking someone if they want to commit an illegal act with you probably isn't illegal.) The crime, if any, was very minor; the intent of the sting operation was to discourage the activity by giving annoyance-level arrests to a few people.  If Senator Craig were anyone else, a guilty plea would've just quietly gone into his record, or he would've fought it and won. (I'm dodging the question of whether it's proper to do sex stings like this, which necessarily target homosexuals.  That's one of the larger questions that the article raised, and I upmodded this post just for that.)
How many American kids would know what a gulag is?   How many people in Sweden actually advocate Communism? Generally, the Swedes tend to have a much better understanding of world events and politics than anyone else. They scored first in the [National Geographic Survey of knowledge](http://news.nationalgeographic.com/news/2002/11/1126_021120_TVGeoRoperSurvey.html). The US was 2nd to last, just ahead of Mexico. 
My expectation is that it's not in for the same reason wx and django aren't in: the release schedules are different, and ipython is very actively maintained, so it would ossify in the standard distribution.
Can we not call the reddit developers, gods.  I saw them from the wedding picture, they look more like ... oh I don't know...software developers.
Casualties of War indeed. I think that after directing that one, and then seeing it happen for real *again*, he may have felt he just had to dothis one. Don't try to tell me DePalma has lost his edge.
nice photo, there just people get over it
What about war on smoke?  I'm not sure what we'd fight with though...water cannons maybe, but that would suck next year when we fight clouds.  I'm sick of shooting at abstract nouns.  At least give me some vapor, dammit! Next: War on vaporizers.
Durr durr.  Murican stupid.
What do hundreds of porn magazines plus one artist plus plenty of time equal? ….
&gt; I don't recall ever seeing a variable named "exit" or "quit", which brings us back to that possibility isn't probability. Google code search gives about 2000 instances of ["quit ="](http://www.google.com/codesearch?hl=en&amp;lr=&amp;q=%22quit+%3D%22+lang%3Apy&amp;btnG=Search) and another 800 ["def quit"s](http://www.google.com/codesearch?hl=en&amp;lr=&amp;q=%22def+quit%22+lang%3Apy&amp;btnG=Search). I didn't bother to search for exit.
Anybody can claim anything..
But, but, but the entire internet -- every last man, woman, child, and dog -- is behind Ron Paul, savior of the freakin' universe. How can anyone else possibly be doing well?
He will be missed.
Repost without shouting and spelling mistakes and I'll mod it up:)
that rubber-gloved hand looks like a phtoshop job
This is your resume. This is your resume on drugs.
Seriously, the guy was asking for it. That type of prank is stupid, if only because this can totally happen as a result, and with no one else to blame for it. Whack!  Ohhhh, I shouldna.............
They missed it completely. Not a single word about porn.
it is really neat the way this story unfolds.
Public Prosecutors.  Public Defenders.
I want to know what colors he used, and if the paper smelled nice.
I last tried this game 15 years ago.  I now finally understood it and won on my first try.  I can now die happy.
Sometimes, but I never got a chance to do so with the original headphones because I somehow managed to lose them very shortly after getting it so I can't comment on that.
&gt;You can have propaganda that attempts to make you hug everyone and really love bunnies That's called ["cuteoverload"]( http://cuteoverload.com/ ) I think.
If I wash them the world will blow up for sure.
Be sure to check brands and labels before packing up your picnic...
I have cousins who are orthodox Jews. I'm not your standard-issue American. Like Muslims, observant Jewish women are supposed to keep their hair covered once they're married in order to make sure men don't freak at the sight of them. Men are to keep their heads covered and grow beards  out of respect for god. It's a completely different thing, and I have no doubt that's the case in Muslim communities. I mean, just look at the picture this thread is ostensibly about.
The guy is making these allegations in his own defense.  If you were such a low life as him, what else would your excuse be? Disclaimer: It is absolutely disgusting that this happened.   
No, he's right, some of the documentation really does need better examples. For instance, urllib2 and cookielib. I've always meant to sit down and write better docs for them, but [someone else has already done it](http://www.voidspace.org.uk/python/articles/urllib2.shtml)
Don't do things that will get you shot with a taser. As an added bonus, it's just as good as not being shot with a gun.
My money is on the 3 ton squirrels.
But the Japanese don't have gigantic aircraft carriers and nuclear warheads. So fuck broadband, we can kill stuff. YEAH! (Subtle notes of sarcasm!)
"am I An A I ma?" Pretty passable palindrome.   edit: alliteration
There you go..!
I agree with you. Totally. Or something.
The colonies fixed themselves...it happened the same week Global warming reversed and Paris Hilton went to jail
I am not dumb, and I do read science fiction. I assume the SFWA is Science Fiction Writers of America, though the article does not state this. Thanks, though, for giving us no clue what the fuck the DMCA may be. Pardon me.
Not always. The question mark at the end of the web address denotes the beginning of the query string, which has the following syntax:  ?key1=value1[&amp;key2=value2...] The ampersand at the end delimits separate key/value pairs. If you add a second question mark in the query string, some web server preprocessors are going to barf on it (although it seems to work in this particular case).
I have a simple, simple system.  Just a plain, damn text file.  I call it CHANGELOG and put it on my desktop (linux or windows) and I just copy paste entries.  urls, various directory locations I may forget.  Sometimes I date the entries so it fills up with the recent date on top.  So, I can go back to various portion of the text to see what I was thinking at the time.
correction:  Japan has ~1/25th of the land area and 42% of the population that makes population density 337/km² about eleven times more dense compared to United States 31/km² but you shouldn't really look at average population density, rather compare similar areas (e.g. Tokyo with NY)
Milky white skin n' blood red lips aside, your Spanish Armada theory doesn't quite hold up. The majority of the Spanish survivors who made it to land were summararily executed by the hundreds (except for a few nobles who probably returned to Spain ASAP because they could affort it). &gt; By the end of September 1588 the queen's deputy, Fitzwilliam, was able to report to her secretary, Lord Burghley, that the Armada alarm was over. Soon after, he reckoned that only about 100 survivors remained in the country. In 1596, an envoy of King Phillip II of Spain arrived in Ireland to make inquiries of survivors and was successful in only eight cases. [Wiki link ](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Spanish_Armada_in_Ireland#Landfall) 
FYI - I lost my faith in any single source long ago.  Who gives a crap who said it - I need correlation with another respectable source.  Editorially, they have all jumped the shark.
Problem is, if you ask him about it he'll just deny it.
Remove the "dis" and you've got it. Paul's an objectivist and that's really nothing new.
You have to wait until season-end for the DVD.  Getting the eps as they come is not the same thing. Some suckers would pay for that season pass. They'd be suckers, but they'd pay. In fact some of them, after the season ends, would then buy the DVD.
You beat me to SLS from the TAMU ftp repository, downloaded and "burned" onto floppies with rawrite.exe. Then I actually booted up my 386DX-40 to Linux, astonishing! I had to email someone to point me to more good Linux stuff, so I sent a message to the author, Linus, and he pointed me to SUNSites.  Then Slackware in 1995, from Walnut Creek CD-ROM, to Slackware 12, from torrent of the internet today. I tried RedHat, Suse, and Debian, but you know what they say: Once you go Slack, you never go back.
Were you having trouble with the golden rule?  In answer to your question: "Clearly not!"  I don't make the rules, but if I did - a woman could wear a Burka or a Bikini and I wouldn't care. While you play games with "what if she wanted to wear a Burka at the beach" as if everyone goes to the beach wanting to wrap themselves in black robes and rubber gloves, the reality is that we would like to see a culture where the woman has a REAL CHOICE, and not just the fictional one you use for your argument.
&gt;I wish Reddit had a super-downmod, like a -20 that users could deploy once every so often. I would use it on this comment.  I upmodded him only after reading your comment.
"I can't quit you..."
"Isn't it about time for someone to come out and claim that they had sex with Craig? " Sure, where's Jeff Gannon/Guckert?  Even if he didn't, he'll say he did.
"Isn't it about time for someone to come out and claim that they had sex with Craig? " Sure, where's Jeff Gannon/Guckert?  Even if he didn't, he'll say he did.
laughter executed
No, it's the new creative writing.
Yeah.  If you ever wanted to learn Haskell, now would be the time. You wouldn't believe the number of questions there that have efficient one-line solutions. Seriously, one line.
No, Ron Paul's campaign is fuelled by agreement of the ideals he espouses and Ron Paul's credibility to follow through with implementing and sticking to those ideals.  Those ideals are polar opposite of what the other candidates are espousing and their track records show them to be against individualist ideals, which means they have no chance in hell of getting my and many other peoples votes.  Collectivists of all forms are bad(socialism, fuedalism, dictatorships, ..), individualists and constitutionalist ie the American way, are good.  
[[ python-Bugs-1144263 \] reload() is broken for C extension objects](http://mail.python.org/pipermail/python-bugs-list/2005-February/027711.html)
I knew someone who lived in Japan. While technically, by spec, it is faster, but in reality it is slower than your average broadband in America.
Yeah. I mean, there's a ton of weird issues here that are flying way under the radar.
Wow...this is one of those well written articles that reminds me how fucking awake I have really become.
Not as bad as their Blood Bank -- friggen vampires
Well, yes, he could have gotten worse, and likely should have. It's called child pornography, and the law doesn't care whether she was your girlfriend when the  photos were taken, or you just had a bad breakup with her, or whatever. There was a case like that here in Canada about 2 years ago.  Creep gets dumped by younger babe, creep posts nude under-18 shots of her, creep is still in jail now because that is the precise definition of child porn. Some people are just stupid.  Sleazy, too, it appears.
Who's this "us," kemosabe?  I really hope there aren't 7 billion political drama queens posting paranoid crap about imaginary "false flag" operations on the internet. Though it seems like it sometimes. 
Modded down for suggesting America would be better off it behaved more like a dictatorship without trials. Be careful what you wish for. Letting the government solve problems by shooting people on the spot sounds good when you're dealing with kidnappers. But not so good when tanks roll in to Tianamen square to break up peaceful protests. Another problem with this is it ignores the plight of sweatshop workers (the real reason chinese junk is so cheap) that travel long distances to work 16 hour days for next to nothing. A woman tried to unionize a nike factory ten years back and they set her on fire.   And on top of that, often, after months of backbreaking work, the companies simply refuse to pay them, and there's nothing they can do about it. Construction workers regularly freak out and jump off the buildings they just completed. Now, I don't know what this guys situation was, and nothing justifies kidnapping kids. But according to the non linkjacked story, all he wanted was a measly 300 bucks to get back home to his family, which means he was likely the type of migrant worker described above. Who wants to bet he was going through similar bullshit, and just flipped out?    So again, think twice before you endorse the ways of the chinese government.
I would like to go on record as being against that.
Don't worry. You are.
We must not be thinking of the same Cuba...
1000s of cops tased in training or as demonstrations, and none have died yet.
there is a slight language barrier, and the whole communism/communism rebound thing.
or that a cute cop suddenly makes it "entrapment" isn't the rules that a cop can't initiate anything with anyone? that the person has to come up to the undercover cop?  i don't see how this could possible be construed as entrapment.
Don't call it that.
A:  I wouldn't like it either. 1:  The same Tom Green deposited a rotted roadkill raccoon on the desk of Mike Bullard (Canada's ex-wannabe-Letterman) and almost made the guy puke. So it's six of one, and......
1. Show source. 2. Make edit. 3. Post to http://bugs.python.org/ 4. Profit!!!
Funny video of an inarticulate contestant.
I hope they return him for the deposit.
I dunno if anyone else does this, but I tend to think twice before upmodding comments with the 'anticipated downmods' card. Sometimes, 'anticipated downmods' just isn't a good reason to not downmod the comment. Of course, your comment was just a joke, and so obviously my comment is, uh...presented in a joking manner as well..of course.
don't call it interest.  Call it a happy finance charge.
The system works!  They reported, you decided.
Is that a prosthetic arm? Her hand looks plasticky
..fucking 'fag' republicans and *their* 'man-cunt licking'... whoa!
..fucking 'fag' republicans and *their* 'man-cunt licking'... whoa!
As good as itunes?  thats not going to be hard.  Itunes is an abomination.
kai su teknon
Those things don't work if you don't land on them perfect.
It's a piece trying brush under the rug that people agree with Ron Paul's message, with the ruse that people are just frustrated with the other candidates.  It's actually an insult to people's intelligence.  The guy is ignorant or it's yet more propaganda.
&gt; Why, oh why, can't I find editorial peace? Like it or not no editor has all things for all people, and as others have hinted, it really does depend on what language you're using and what type of editing you do. Eclipse is great for Java, unless you want "little things" like... keyboard macros. A non-programmable programmer's editor--WTF?! NetBeans has turned into a pretty decent platform as well (I'm less familiar with it, but that will change as I do more JRoR projects--pretty good Ruby editor). TextMate is the de facto Ruby editor on OSX; it's okay but I've found it a little irritating to get used to--I'm getting there. e on Windows is a partial TextMate clone; it will probably become my standard Windows text editor but I'm using Windows less and less. I still use jEdit a surprising amount; some of the plugins do a decent-enough job. Emacs has a decent Rails mode from what I hear; I haven't tried it yet. As I've been heavy in to Java in 2007 (and will be until the end of it) I've barely touched it since April or so :(
RTFA: &gt; Give it about six months and NBC will be calling back with an olive branch in hand, hoping to get back onto iTunes. Only this time, NBC will have an even worse agreement with Apple.
I'm flying around right now on Debian-etch w/ nvidia 8600 and the nvidia 100.14.11 driver. dual monitor no less.   I betcha it works great on intel cards too. ATI has horrible driver support (they're even bad on the windows side). I never expect anything to work with an ATI card.  but for everyone with an Nvidia or Intel card and 3d driver installed I bet it works like a charm
 **FTFA:** &gt;The kidnapper, shot and injured, lies on the ground and was immediately sent to a hospital for treatment. "The kidnapper, shot and injured, lies on the ground and was immediately sent to a hospital for **organ harvesting**." Fixed it. 
I will definitely check the board out--thank you for the invite.  I appreciate your clarification, and I must agree with many of your points (especially your point on the media).  I will also concede that it is much more likely to find a species thought to be extinct for a few years, than a species thought to be extinct for 300.  It is difficult (or impossible), however, to ever be sure of an extinction (hence the term used by biologists:"funtional extinction").  It is too bad the media didn't catch on to this, because this type of news will have the mindless idiots claiming that the scientists were wrong, which will add fuel to their claims that the world is flat, 6000 years old, and not being ravaged by our species. You are obviously not one of these idiots, and I feel bad for being harsh with you.  Even so, your initial comments were rather loose, leading me to beieve that you were not being rational in your line of thought.  I was simply taking your argument too literally. Lately, I am finding it increasingly difficult to give people the benifit of the doubt.
me http://flickr.com/photos/fourbarking/458085218/in/set-72157600073863584/
Posting links to two loony articles full of crazy speculation doesn't "confirm" that fake terrorists are going to attack Portland.  When the labor day weekend passes without "a 9/11-like false flag 'incident'" in Portland or the San Francisco Bay Area will you at least come back and post a little mea culpa? 
funny stuff
According to wikipedia  [crimes against humanity](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuremberg_Trials) was one of the charges brought against all of them.  I don't think a lot of people are surprised that awful things happen during a war. I think that most people were lulled into thinking this war would be over with quickly so it would be kept to a minimum. At this point, a majority of Americans support withdrawal.
And yet, looking at the "luncheon meat" case in my local supermarket, it's obvious that *someone* does eat it.
Need a little inspiration for blog ideas?  Here you go...
just to nitpick, you can skip the chmod +x and do: sudo sh GoogleEarthLinux.bin (yes, it is a shell script, just with a .tar.bz2 file attached at the end.  btw, to learn the type of a file, use the "file" command.)
Giddy-up-a-oom-papa-oom-papa-mow-mow.
That there is something contemptible about the gentlemen in question themselves, which dismisses the excuse of "you think we're all the same"?
Here is a longer article about it. [Link](http://www.newscientist.com/article.ns?id=mg18624945.800)
&gt; No wonder their products are cheaper than ours. Yeah, that having no respect for human life leads to real bargains.
&gt; Things like [...] *GarbageCollection* appear in few, if any, of the "corporate languages'" check boxes. Whoops. *Edit* Even though GC is pretty typical these days, it still probably on a list of features for the suits to mull over; I just thought it was funny. I suspect the list of feature checkboxes looks (more or less) like:  [ ] Is it Java?   [ ] Is it .NET? 
Negotiate This: http://homepage.mac.com/mrhouse/iblog/C589109907/E2001292642/Media/TSquareiblog.jpg 
Good for you. Go for it. Meanwhile, on the other side of the Atlantic, I'm going to keep my hands off jailbait.
Don't worry, scro, plenty of tards live kickass lives, My first wife was a tard. Now she's a pilot.
I don't blame the military.  They don't have to abide by the same rules.. and they do not.  One of their jobs is to maintain morale and quite honestly "ThinkProgress" is not a site I would consider conducive to that objective.  Hell, I might call it sedition, but that's legal now so who cares.  All the same, the military is not subject to civil law (i.e. kiss the constitution goodbye when you join up - unless your violation occurs on U.S. Civilian soil.  On the bright side, our military personnel have more rights than most of the other military folks in the world.
Take the ups before the anguish.  The ups cost money, and that's why you're a hooker. Pardon me, 'call girl'
Информация об автомобильных дорогах в Украине. Карты, путешествия, фото, строительство и реконструкция автобанов м автомагистралей в контексте Евро-2012.
Of course there is a reason.  The God of Housing has favored you.  If you decline His offer, you are clearly an Unbeliever and will be doomed to rent for all eternity.
bookvillasinbali.com provide bali villas booking Holiday luxury Villa Bali Online Reservation
I was worried about things like encoding integers as power-sets.  That quickly leads to symbol blow-up.
upmod for confidence and correct use my favorite word
The indictments were for: 1. Participation in a common plan or conspiracy for the accomplishment of crime against peace  2. Planning, initiating and waging wars of aggression and other crimes against peace  3. War crimes  4. Crimes against humanity The first three are a result of waging an aggressive war, the fourth is a logical consequence of waging such a war.  I honestly don't believe that the citizens of the United States know what is going on in Iraq.  They saw the "shock and awe" bombings on TV, but most of the real stuff like grisly images of dead children do not make it into the news.
"If Apple gets their way it is better for me." What?  The DVD of Heroes costs about $32 for 23 episodes.  Via Apple's retail outlet, it costs $46 total. A DVD costs more to make and distribute.  You dont get extras or bonsu material. Do you think that NBC was asking *MORE* than what the current retailer are getting for their product via DVD?  Presently, the RETAIL price of an episode of Heroes is something like $1.40 The distribution method DOESNT MATTER to NBC.  DVD &gt; Digital Distribution, yet apple wants more than $0.60 per episode for retail. Apple has its walled-garden users by the balls, and is cutting them off of NBC's product so that they can keep a massive mark-up. 
OH WHOLEY SHIT !
Thank you!
Oh, reddit is only for free stuff?
hi
Hm.  I live in Tokyo.  I pay $27 per month flat rate for fibre.  I got 2000kb/s downloading something ten minutes ago.  So what are you getting there on your average broadband in America?
[Mystery meat](http://video.yahoo.com/video/play?vid=148978)! Will it be a dream?  Or a dud!
Wait until I tell my parents I was just being very philosophical when I was a kid.
hey guys give me points
This is another example of what my theatre prof always said: that otherwise coordinated, reasonable human beings become bumbling idiots when they act on stage and to treat your actors as if they were puppy dogs and small children.
It sounds very similar in scope to Lotus Notes. I wonder if there's any FAQ to point out in what way it's different.
Thanks for the source there.
Snobbery does not suit you.
Reparations for Conan O'Brian!
That would be cool if it was cool.
&gt; It uses simple Java annotations to invoke native functions - a giant leap in ease of use and usability compared to writing custom Java Native Interface (JNI) glue code. Even the most trivial JNI is a PITA.  import com.jinvoke.JInvoke;   import com.jinvoke.NativeImport;   public class Example {    @NativeImport(library="User32")    public static native int MessageBox(int hwnd, String text, String caption, int type);    public static void main(String[] args) {     JInvoke.initialize();     MessageBox(0, "This MessageBox is a native Win32 MessageBox", "Caption", 0);    }   }  That's substantially easier than writing the equivalent JNI. Not saying I'd pay for it (I don't need JNI much anymore), but that's a lot easier. *Edit* Oooookay, this is being modded down because...? Everything should be free and J/Invoke is easier than JNI?!
Interesting choice of words for the title...
this is an outrage!
I haven't tried that particular download, but it didnt work and I get the "crash X error" as seen in the google group above.  I have a nvidia card.
It's for old times' sake.
Probably not, but the companies that employ them might be.
I'm not condoning kidnapping. What kind of guy are you condoning and cheering on Communist China? America is supposed to be the good guys, remember? You're supposed to fight for Democracy, human rights and fair trials.  You seem to have the idea they shot him because they're the good guys and fighting for whats right. If they're crossed, the chinese government will shoot ANYONE without trial. Not just insane hostage-takers, but union leaders, activists...you too.
Doesn't she drown with all that garment she's on?
My 1999 definition, of Terrorism, as provided by an Executive administration headed by Clinton, was defined as the use of violence to gain media attention. But what happens when the President uses media attention to gain violence?
Where was she raised?
ZEHR GUT
And you can get soiled panties from a vending machine.
Google Earth just doesn't seem to respond to ctrl-alt-a on my laptop... but the flight sim can be selected from the tools menu. Not really very hidden, is it?
I can.  This is why WAR should be a *last resort*.
do you really believe that women invented the burka to hide themselves from the looks of other men? Isn't it more likely it was a man's invention to hide their property?
I will always notice it now.
Wow, Godwin's Law in the frickin headline!  I'd expect nothing else from my friends at infowars.
We indeed have surpassed stereo sound!
You are wrong problem is not insecurities in the girls own minds. I am from europe and i went topless but i would not dare to go topless here. In europe you see breasts in tv all the time. Here even stupid ass is censored. Problem is with censorship, people are not used to it and even i am allowed to go topless by canadian law, its quite risky.
Oops. I swear, I did not mean this here, I meant it as a reply to another post!!! Here it actually does...
It's broken. He's fixing (a small part of) it.
Nah, but I can't be expected to read all the sites submitted and the comments on them. :(
It's not a good thing BECAUSE it's such a risk. I'm willing to go on record anonymously on the internet in saying "I am sure they will fail", that's how certain I am.  Seriously, it's less the fact that NBC is making a mistake, and more the fact that they are basing their mistake on a ridiculous concept: that removing legal places to download their shows is going to DECREASE piracy.  Sure, you say, but they're not removing legal places! They're just switching to a new legal place, where they'll be making more money! Yeah, but I think loads of people will be like "hang on! I can't get The Office on iTunes! Oh, there was something on reddit about them offering it on their new...video..service..thing...whatever. I'll just torrent it." They're losing far too many people in the switch.
We always hear it, but in fact, the best way to make money is one dogs understand - as part of a cooperative pack - not as a cannibal, killing and eating your own.
Do I have to look up what pre-war nazis were like so I can compare them to the population as presented in this article? I might as well.  [edit] Okay...I *personally* think Bush's foreign policy of, let's face it, borderline imperialism, is supported by the fact that A) He set up enough rules post 9/11 to preempt action by congress to prevent war and B) By not instating a draft, at any costs, which means the war is always affecting someone else and lowering the percent of the population willing to vote for someone else. The idea of blind nationalism runs parallel to Nazi Germany, but we'd have to have a post 9/11 "patriot" atmosphere for a much longer time.  So...yeah, my cutoff point for the USA to be a "Totalitarian" state is the invasion of Iran and another republican president. After that, it's over America, it's been real...
:o At least you corrected yourself. :) You're welcome.
So glad I don't eat that anymore.
Problem complexity is in in terms of growth:  As the size of the input grows (e.g. the number N of tumblers) how much longer does it take to solve (e.g. testing each combo takes O(10^N) time to solve, so that is an exponential problem).
Very enlightening. Thanks!
You can join a metropolitan buying club in the DC area and get his products delivered every 6 weeks, or you can go out to [](http://www.restauranteve.com/index2.html) in Alexandria or [Komi](http://www.komirestaurant.com/) in DC which both have menu selections that feature his products. He used to have a wholesaler who was taking his stuff up to DC-area farmers markets, I think including at Eastern Market, but I don't know if that is still the case. And for what it's worth, the Whole Foods in Charlottesville carries his products as well. He's not discriminating against "city folks".  He's discriminating against people who are outside of his bioregion, or "foodshed".  He's discriminating against people who don't want to know the face behind their food.
Well you're a good man :)
We weren't allowed to sign out of the NICU without taking 2 large cans of high calorie preemie formula. If my son was a micro preemie who desperately needed to put on weight, I would have agreed that something with a higher calorie density was in order. My son was 10lbs when he was born, and 15.75lbs when he left the NICU at one month. Increasing his weight by over 50% in one month is not healthy for baby who was already in the 100th percentile for weight. I wish hospitals would pass out a diaper bag that had a manual pumping kit instead of all the formula samples and coupons. It seems very common for nurses to give new moms a hard time about not accepting the free formula "goodie" bag, to the point of not letting them sign their baby out unless they accept it. If a mom says no to formula, it shouldn't be mentioned again by the hospital unless there's a legit medical reason.
Goodbye, file().  I always thought "for item in file('inf.txt')" read better than "for item in open('inf.txt')", but I'm sure people thought this through. Goodbye, reduce().  OK, I get it, Python is not supposed to be functional, and you were slow anyway, but every time I used you I felt slightly better about my decision not to use Haskell for the project I am working on. Hello, nonlocal.  Maybe with you we can come one step closer to real closures.
unfair to moths
"3-5% of their revenue from the iTunes store. " Your math must be totally broken.  Right now, an episode of NBC-TV goes for $2.00 NBC wants "more than twice as much".  If the markup is 4%, then the wholesale price is currently $1.92. You can buy a DVD of 23 episodes of Heroes for $32.  You get Extras, Outakes, Bonus etc.  You get a DVD.  The *retailer gets HIS markup*.  You get a physical DVD.  The DVD gets shipped all-over-the-damn-place.  The cost?? $1.40 total retail per episode. Apple is exploiting its walled-garden consumers. 
Language-dependent, and not a particularly useful distinction -- let's assume you have transparent remoting -- now what's the difference?
Yes, because then it won't be degrading to have strange men violate you.
&gt;There are a lot of working moms who are away from their babies most of the day Sorry but I am so not cool with that.
We don't need a bigger picture. Senator Craig's "wide stance" is plenty big enough.
Interesting article - has anyone else checked out this site? Kind of a Reddit for the essay writing types...
So what they are saying is that if they get political and make sure everyone has insurance (or try to with their measly 15 million budget) so they can detect cancer sooner and more often, that is better than trying to stop people from getting cancer in the first place. Note to self... ACS off the charity list as they have become political instead of medical.
For some reason, whenever I see the contruct, *Islamo-fascist*, I always think of *Zionazi*!
&gt; I am not ashamed of my choices and I will fully defend mine or anyone else’s right to make them. But when you ask me if you should do this? My immediate instinct is a loud, desperate no. This is kinda how I think people should feel about abortion.
Phew! Now I can sleep tonight.
Bernard Kerik and Rudolph Guiliani don't care. [They made bank](http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/6684832/).
May i represent Europe in saying, WTF?
They would prefer a good lynching, but those damn civil rights assholes fucked up their good time.
LA Mayor Antonio Villaraigosa's affair with Mirthala Salinas inspires Angelinos to multi-task as never before.
"You do not want them to feel a need to hide their genitals." Everybody except pornstars uses garments to hide their genitals. Am I missing something?
The author of the article most certainly did **not** want a live chicken.  He wanted meat.  He wanted a slaughtered chicken, cold-packed for shipping via FedEx.  FedEx handles meat and other food products **all the time**.  One of my local restaurants gets a delivery of Maryland crabmeat daily. There's no way FedEx would handle a **live** chicken.  Try rereading the article.
The first part of your comment is contradictory to the second half. *JOBS* wants $2.00 per episode for what you can buy on DVD for $1.40 (Heroes DVD) at Wal-Mart. What were yous saying again?
buy wellbutrin online  Wellbutrin SR (Bupropion) Wellbutrin SR (Anti Depressant) is a pharmaceutical prescription antidepressant, which acts directly on the brain and other nerve cells. It is also used to treat ADHD (Attention Deficit Disorder), bipolar depression, chronic fatigue syndrome, cocaine addiction, nicotine addiction, and lower back pain. Also, aids in quitting smoking (identical to Zyban). It is chemically unrelated to tricyclic, tetracyclic, selective serotonin re-uptake inhibitor, or other known antidepressant agents.  buy bupropion hcl online  buy bupropion sustainedrelease zyban  bupropion buy paypal fedex  buy bupropion hcl  bupropion buy pal pay  buy bupropion low cost  bupropion buy online  buy bupropion sr  bupropion veterinary buy  buy bupropion hcl where  bupropion buy  buy bupropion on sale  paypal bupropion buy  buy bupropion online  buy bupropion no prior prescrition  bupropion hydrochloride buy  buy bupropion  bupropion buy sr  bupropion buy bupropion online order cheap prescription drug  buy bupropion online dream pharmaceutical  bupropion buy tramadol online bupropion antidepressant anti  buy bupropion in the usa  pay pal buy bupropion  cheap bupropion buy online  buy bupropion smoking  buy bupropion 150mg sr tabs  buy bupropion on the net  buy bupropion cheap  order bupropion  order bupropion smoking  order bupropion online  order bupropion hcl online  canadian bupropion hcl order online  mexican bupropion hcl order online  order bupropion hcl  online bupropion hcl order online  discount bupropion hcl order online  bupropion buy bupropion online order cheap prescription drug  bupropion overnight order  mail bupropion order
Modded down for bad math.  Please correct me if I am wrong, but the article appears to say that a site that gets 650,000 page views per month makes about 10k-20k per month.  By my math, that is 120k-240k per year. Then in the next paragraph it talks of a site that gets over a million page views per month and the revenue is 40k per year.  The final verdict is that you need over a million views per month to make a living. Something isn't right there.
Oh........ they're pros.... flying around competing in Doom 3, Far Cry, Painkiller, Half Life2 tournaments. Oh no... they're flying around playing in tournaments playing Halo, Halo, and Halo... I'm sure that was the proper context to make an informed choice. Duuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh! And by the way, I would kick your ASS at Halo and then decimate and obliterate you on ANY PC shooter. Suck that down, little kid.
Senators are supposed to be leaders. He should have stood up for gay rights, or at the very least, acknowledge that he was gay. Not be another forced-by-the-party-base-Republican.
I don't buy one word of this.  Everyone knows hos can't read or write.
I'll laugh plenty if Craig kills himself.  Another power-tripping asshole dead, just not soon enough, unfortunately.
You are correct that the law won't change anything about degradation. You do not seem to be paying attention to the fact that legalizing prostitution can have many *other* benefits like safety (both from violence and from STDs), independence from pimps, the ability to go to the police for legal protection instead of having them harass you, even unionization, benefits, training. [This article](http://www.cbc.ca/cp/national/070323/n032380A.html) has a bit more on the subject if you are so inclined. Edit: the current legal situation (i.e. prostitution being illegal) does a large amount to help cause situations like [this](http://nymag.com/news/features/30018/?ftr-promo), which is among the most depressing things I've ever seen.
I was trying to start a discussion about the idea of an anarchic system instead of the current system, and by the point I spoke I thought we were talking in a more general sense and not about the article itself.
There's also Planner (formerly MrProject) http://live.gnome.org/Planner
OK
I'm heavy into java, and I still use emacs constantly.  It's still better than Eclipse for XML, and there are enough power-tools in Emacs I turn to it for certain types of Java editing, and just let Eclipse refresh at the end and compile.   I have a partially working RemoteEclipse port updated for Eclipse 3, but it really needs a lot of work to be very useful....
You sound like you have personal experience. Were you stationed in Iraq?
I'll go on record as saying that the Internet speeds we have here in the USA now are as fast as we'll ever have, period.  In fact, I suspect they will get slower as the 'net gets more congested and network non-neutrality starts squeezing your tubes shut.
But the roadkill she found last month outside her ranch was a new one even for her, worth putting in a freezer hidden from curious onlookers: Canion believes she may have the head of the mythical, bloodsucking chupacabra.   
itunes is a pile of garbage.  Bloated.  Buggy.  And useless except that it is mandated by Apple for their mp3 player.  Apple refuses to let you use your DAP with any other software so they can keep you in their walled-garden in order to force-feed you media retail. Why the hell would you prefer itunes to Real Player?
Because there is a limit to how much tape there is on a roll. I've seen [more dedicated wives.](http://www.flickr.com/photo_zoom.gne?id=1246171767&amp;size=o)
A "service" is just (more or less) an independent chunk of functionality; they can be exposed however you want. SOAP's "advantage" is that it can use WSDL to provide a description of services available, what types of messages those services expect, etc. not (typically) available with REST.
There's a pretty big difference between Oscar Mayer and, say, [Molinari](http://www.molinarisalame.com/).  The good stuff shouldn't stink.
Your comments make even me cry. :`(
Sucks, doesn't it?
Looking at the picture closer. They are in fact middle-eastern. No wrong impressions.
...and dads.  We care about our children too.
Thats hard to gauge though, depending on your niche.  For instance if you had a subject on your site that is a higher paying click through subject.  A site with  10k views a month could easily equate to 30 to 40,000 a month.
I wonder if using TOR would help these guys out.  I hear they use it in some places to get around repressive governmental interference.
Do you have any other labels you would like to apply to large groups of people? You must know all cops, or at least most of them.
&gt; Goodbye, reduce() Welcome to [functools](http://docs.python.org/dev/3.0/library/functools.html), reduce().
He didn't change his mind per se, he just stayed the order until the Iowa Supreme Court rules on it. Personally I think even staying the order is a bit retarded, but I can kinda see the logic on a practical level: If it does get overturned, it might be simpler to not let any gay people marry in the meantime.
Correct me if I'm wrong, but the money they took in response to 9/11 victims found various non-9/11 purposes as well. Red Cross is under [distributed](http://www.cbsnews.com/stories/2002/07/30/eveningnews/main516886.shtml) leadership that has less accountability than we would expect. 
Free refills are a ruse.  Large straws and supersizes mean you get used to eating more at every meal.  Not many people go back for free refills, and even those that do aren't cutting into the profits very much.  They're drinking only a few pennies worth of water and syrup.  Most of the cost of drink at a fast food restaurant is in the *initial sale*; the labor and materials. The cost hit of any particular refill is tiny, but the payoff is you coming back again, and buying larger servings each time.
Conversion is not the same thing as built-in export, though.
actually it's control of "everyone" by a select few whites...  pretty much the exact same shit that's been happening for the last 2000+ years ;)
yes, I thought so too.  The author is incredibly knowledgeable. But, it's no surprise given he spent 21 years at the US Treasury Department.
"I saw an article saying that NBC wanted to charge $5 AN EPISODE" GOD DAMN IT!  *Apple* wanted to charge $5.00.  NBC, the producer doesnt get to set the _fcuking retail price_.  Do you not see the difference here? BestBuy will sell you a DVD of 23 Episodes for $32.  Apple sells the same 23 episodes, minus the DVD, minus the extras and bonus material for $46. What do you think is going on here?  Apple is *RAPING* you kool-aid drinkers.
So they should all die? I feel like I'm answering a youtube comment.
A lot of you have heard about the Jena Six in Louisiana and how the DA, who thinks he's a little White God, is trying to do a Jim Crow number on all six. Well, now you can help.
* 802.11  * USB  * IEEE 1394 (aka FireWire)  * POP  * SMTP  * IMAP  * XMPP  * RSS  * Atom  * XHTML  * MPEG-1  * MPEG-2  * MPEG-4  * H.264
She is wearing gloves so no man catches a glimpse of her naked wrist or hand.  It is a lie that "it is a choice." Perhaps for some, yes, but thousands of women are forced through social and familial coercion to live this sick misogynistic existence. One long-time Iranian female professor was thrown out of her profession when her sleeve slipped and bared a little of her wrist while writing on the blackboard. She was forced to remain hidden in her family home with black painted windows after that (so no man might catch a glimpse of her). Fortunately after a number of years her family was able to sneak her out of Iran and she now lives in the west where she can teach and write about her experiences to help the rest of us know that for most women it is not a choice. edited to add link: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Azar_Nafisi  
Yeah, but that is what that page is trying to do - gauge how many hits it takes to make a living. I see your point, but at the least they should arrive at a better conclusion.  Obviously you DON'T need a million hits a month, if they have an example of 650,000 hits a month making a comfortable living. Ultimately, it needs to be clearer I think.  I found the topic interesting and I think even those of us who don't have blogs trying to make a living off this still wonder what it takes.  The article doesn't clear it up for me as much as I'd like.
Ignorant fucking monkey.  You are saying that you have better opinions on the best FPS's than PEOPLE THAT PLAY FOR A FUCKING LIVING.  The players are in Halo tourneys, the money is in Halo tourneys, the best game is Halo.  Show me a team for Far Cry, Doom 3, (are you fucking kidding), Painkiller, or Half Life 2 getting paid a million JUST TO COMPETE.   Idiotic bitch.
I just recently bought 30 days worth of Military MRE's.  I live in Canada where they are not illegal to own.  Out of curiosity does anyone know why they are illegal to own in the US?  They can possibly save lives, so why are they restricted?
Aeesh
Someone's going to see them in the locker room, the doctor's office, and unless they die a virgin, in the bedroom.
3. Avoid Server-Side Validation   Try to avoid server-side validation, use client-side instead. Server-Side will just consume valuable resources on your servers, and cause more chat back and forth. ?? Am I missing something ?maybe he meant to say : use both.
No problem since I don't buy any of Apple's stuff.
Unfortunate.
you can. but I can't understand question.
You'll get about 20 - 30 cents per thousand page views, as long as 5 to 10 percent or so click on the ads. In other words, define 'making a living'.
*I would have found this more interesting without the thinly veiled social commentary.* Ditto.  It wasn't just thinly veiled social commentary, he was just making things up and tacking a bit of context onto them. In other news, I had a delicious sandwich made from luncheon meats that don't suck today. Also, there's nothing gross about eating heart.  One of my favorite treats is eating sandwiches made from deer heart with my father.
Great post. Although I agree with the first commenter about subtyping being unnecessary, open recursion is an excellent way to capture the essence of what most people consider OO today. (Etymon's understanding of [open recursion comes straight from Pierce](http://etymon.blogspot.com/2006/04/open-recursion-definition.html))
" 'fair trials' fair " As in better than bad I believe. As in good I do not believe. However, it's the best we seem to be able to come up with so far.
&gt; 10.5 Leopard will [etc. etc.] NDA?
Dumbya sux
I can think of a couple of good labels to apply to at least one person. But back to the subject at hand: Lazy cops. That's my label. And yes, I believe lazy cops would just rather shoot you, but there's less paperwork with a Taser. You got fault with that?
Thanks, I'd never even noticed that before.  Now it's bugging me.
Isn't that like having Jeffrey Dahmer tell the world you're a top-notch cook?
igor bring out the d cups &lt;cue organ music&gt;
Hey gardeners! Simplify your life by adding a drip irrigation system to your vegetable garden. Your plants will love it too.
He is the supreme commander of the military.  What the military does is his fault, directly and absolutely.  It's called responsibility, a little something where in our corporatist culture we've forgotten that managers and leaders are supposed to be culpable for the failings of their leadership and not merely for the successes.
The article was based off average salary being 40k a year.
He most likely spoke about his "leadership during 9/11"...
Here's what actually scares me... 1) That 1B options trade 2 weeks ago that the market will collapse next month. 2) A news report I heard on the radio (and unfortunately I can't find online) that a battalian has been called up to guard the DC area... why? 3) A report that we are going to attack Iran starting next week. Now the latter two I would normally dismiss, but does somebody on wall street know something about what is going to happen, especially with all the recent posturing about Iran's nuclear programs.  That option call was very unusual, but certainly it would make sense in the context that next month we're going to be at war.
Have you read the article. It states that marines were ordered to kill "all young men capable of joining military". How on Earth it is not Nazi like. These are the cases which are reported out of conscience from a warzone. We can never estimate how much more is happening there. **Congrats America, You created Hell on Earth**
Must be a boring Friday night for you.
beauty
Hmm... the dealership will (temporarily) register the car to the first buyer, second buyer pays back the registration fee and gets the car signed over to him. If he was to save $20k on the car's price registration fee is no biggie.
Don't get out often, do you?
I kinda like it...it's a microcosm of the imperfection of the human race.
If somebody on wall street knew this was true, it would certainly explain why they made that 1B options trade two weeks ago.  Ya gotta figure if there was a new war, literally a WW3 breaking out in the middle east... that'd kill the market.
Attention. To. Detail.
gracias
For those who might be interested [Songs of Bad Men and Good](http://www.lulu.com/content/808128)
Perhaps what it should say is **"fuelled by disillusionment with partisanship"**. 
Someone really needs to beat her severely because there is a tiny piece of her arm showing and that's against Iranian muslim law
It just seems like absolute overkill,  I didn't even grow up during the corba days but my uncle from IBM told me about that crap.  It seems like the CORBA is reappearing as SOAP.
ThinkProgress is a hate-peddling site.
I would normally think it's hogwash.. however given that huge trade that got publicity that somebody is betting the market will tank in the next month, if they were aware of this happening it would justify the position they took.  There may be no link here, but it's certainly an interesting speculation.  Another war in the middle east would cause the market to tank.
You just replied to a lot of things without ever once actually addressing anything I said.  Oh, except to say that I don't know what I'm talking about without any substantiation of any kind. At this point you're clearly either trolling or just continuing the fight because you don't want to give up. Either way, I don't particularly care any more.
They shouldn't be allowed to go to Fox OR ThinkProgress.  Two sides of an equally damaging coin
This is good for a student, it seems to be a new site and the are off to a great start!
All of the above  *&lt;(:^)
Ooooor, somebody already has by betting 1B in options trades that the market is going to collapse next month.  Coincidence that such an unusual trade comes admist another war?
I will miss him - his joy for beer was contagious. "glorified alcoholism"? ... anonymous_hater ... what have you been smoking?  If enjoying beer = alcoholism, then billions of people are in trouble.
I don't see it.  Maybe a screen shot?
Who says? A little bit o' pain never hurt anybody.
OK, 25 cents average per thousand, that's 4 thousand to make $1, times $40k per year is 16 million hits per year.
Why would anyone want to recreate that crap.
I'm in Boston with verizon dsl and get an average of 1250kbps.  [edit] I was streaming music and had joost running in the background while I tested.
Did he mention he was Microsoft Word Certified?
Time to rummage through the drawers of that big house down the street, find the keys, and take off in the ferrari. Must make my way to the nearest Air Force base and take that fighter jet for a spin before the nuke plants melt down.  BTW, I always assumed that somebody had to at least press a button once a day at a nuke plant or the fuel rods would go into some sort of temporary storage pool. Is that a bad assumption? Do the damn plants just keep running until they melt down in short order?
Any food up close like that looks gross. This guy's a borderline moron.
gandalf was gay!?!?!
Awesome commentary by a cynical and slightly disgruntled editor who has a skew on advertising, politics, the weather, sports, and traffic, along with music (duh) and other random things.
↓ Ron Paul off the politics page
Well, exactly. If republicans wanted complete freedom in their sexual relations, then they should support that position through their voting record(s). But then, maybe they get that extra thrill *because* it's prohibited. 
↓ political opinion not only on the politics page.
thank you for replying, but I still don't get it.  Assuming that under controlled circumstances, it takes x seconds to dial in and test a discreet number, it would take (1E+102)(x) seconds to try the full number of combinations.  Is the trick stopping when I dial the correct number?  Is it avoiding tests after I've dialed the correct number?  Were I to take my lock and add (y) tumblers, it would grow in a predictable way, to 100^(100+y) combinations, wouldn't it?  wouldn't the amount of time needed to solve also be, at  a maximum, (100^(100+y))(x)?
_If_ you're lucky enough to live in the right place in Canada you might be able to pay $100 for cable with speeds _up to_ 25 mbps down / 1 mbps up.  Thanks for the table scraps oh mighty tube lords! These articles are just depressing now.  At first it was exciting to think about it, but then you read about the history of telcos and their monopolistic ways and quickly give up hope.  North America presents the opportunity to be disappointed at every corner if you try and find out why things suck.  Easy to become jaded...
↓ partisan politics, not kept to the politics page.
&gt; Are you lumping all the Sunni-Shiite-Islamists killers in with "we"? No.  Even currently, the daily kills by the coalition exceeds the daily kills by the "Sunni-Shiite-Islamists killers". &gt; Do you see the implication now, or do you need more help? There is no implication there.  You are inferring but don't seem to realize it.  In fact, you seem to have a tendency to infer randomly.  For example, you seem to have already inferred that I believe the US should pull out, though I had not said nor implied this.   
↓ minor political news not kept to the politics subreddit.
Fuck the unipolar world under America. I so wish every country should get nuclear bombs and delivery capability across the globe.  What are the assurances that this wont repeat again once this government is thrown out. What if people like these are reelected after 20 years.
This article has all the eloquence of a chain email
↓ political commentary not kept to the politics subreddit.
Bravo.  What the hell are you doing on Reddit?
only paid off prostitutes would dismiss the ending of a nation
Modded down. For, uh, I dunno. For being pedantic.
I believe the term that is being widely used now is less lethal weapon.
that was a great paper!  thanks for linking it.
Do you know why Kerry and not Edwards was the 2004 Democratic candidate? It's because Karl Rove concluded that Kerry would be easy to beat but Edwards would be a serious contender, so he orchestrated the GOP spin machine to attack Kerry relentlessly. As Rove predicted, the Dems rallied around Kerry and picked him to run. Also as Rove predicted, he was feckless, middling, and painfully easy to beat.
what's the name of the movie?
&gt;Safety belts are usually more dangerous than the fall. Unless you are Tom Cruise.
Just one minor example, here is a REST response, here is a SOAP response. http://www.flickr.com/services/api/response.rest.html http://www.flickr.com/services/api/response.soap.html No comment.   
Just one? It doesn't actually say how many got married; it just highlights one couple that did out of the 20 that applied.
those bibles are placed at our disposal - thus we may dispose of them.
lol. i don't think that's the movie name she's shooting for
[Non-linkjacked](http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2007/08/28/AR2007082801990_pf.html) It looks like the Washington Post need to get their story straight: &gt; eight to 30 times as fast &gt; Ten to 20 times as fast &gt; 17 times as fast Assuming the 100mbit connection they mention is synchronous, that's 8 times faster downstream and 50 times faster upstream than I have in the US.
The biology/organic chemistry one is decent (although by no means exhaustive), but some of the others (e.g. [this one](http://www.3rd1000.com/chronology/chrono33.htm)) are just unacceptable. Still, not a bad find.
It's been a while she has performed well in terms of acting. Also, recently I read in newspaper that she applied silver-plant or something to increase her breast size
For a better explanation about this, check out http://www.mceniry.net/papers/Fast%20Inverse%20Square%20Root.pdf
Without Jackson, Pierre Celis would probably not have come to the US in the early 1990s.  Celis revived (and arguably perfected) the witbier "Belgian White" recipe.  In 1966! Hoegaarden? [Pierre Celis](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hoegaarden_Brewery). I can't stand the ubiquitous Coors version "Blue Moon", but that are a *huge* variety of Belgian Whites available now, thanks in no small part to Michael Jackson and his support of folks like Pierre Celis. http://www.allaboutbeer.com/style/23.4-witbier.html   
It's not an either/or situation.
well, insted of increasing her breast size, may be she can try to increase the level at which she acts in a movie..
Do you actually have nothing better to do than to post every piece of blogspam this newsandpolicy place posts up about Ron Paul? My god man, at least try to link to the original articles!
The government [already paid](http://www.newnetworks.com/ShortSCANDALSummary.htm) for it to be done.
Naaa, there is starting to be way to many indications that something is a foot.  I heard about that recent deployment to DC as well, but only on a radio talk show and not since.  Too many strange things happen that, if you put them together would be strong indicators something big may happen soon.
This is madness!
wala   gzsto maging  hack   perfect 
I can see there being a difference. In a program, it is not to be taken for granted that you can just grab any resource (object with a resource) you want. If the object you are trying to use is not an instance of a singleton, your object will need to have the required object passed as a parameter or it must be otherwise reachable through its parameters. You can still access the constructor for any object (this again can be protected against with proper typing), so it is possible for the loop to appear, but that doesn't happen so easily - and in fact, I have never seen that happen, perhaps others have. I don't know if people have seen it happen with SOA either, though. As I understand, there are no such limitations with SOA. If you know the URL, you can use it (without taking access control issues into account). Perhaps SOA could incorporate some sort of transaction initialization GUID, which would be generated by the client that performs the first query, and would be subsequently used in the rest of the cascading requests? That would ease debugging, and systems could automatically flag two concurrent transactions with the same GUID (disregarding abuse issues). 
Plus we never staged a false flag attack like the burning of the Reichstag to get people to buy into...oh wait...WAKE UP SHEEPLE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!111
The Germany of pre-WWII was ridiculously different from the current United States.  While I detest our our current president, most of his policies, and especially his war, make no mistake that we are not in the same social or economic situation as the Germans. When the sting of the rest of the world banding together to summarily smack our ass still smarts, and inflation is higher than that suffered under the worst of African dictators... then we'll talk. Otherwise, simply another example of Godwin's law in action.
risks of breastfeeding?
Yes, but when the satellites fall, remember the only real currency will be shotgun shell and hard liquor.
&gt; stupid greedy fucking closet gay and yet homophobic policy touting republicans and their male prostitute sucking lobbyists. I want my god damn fiber. corrected
sure it does unless God goes and replaces the pages I guess. But I don't think he does.
Rob Zombie reimagines this horror classic, putting his stamp on the Halloween story.   There are stabbings, bludgeoning, and general mayhem.
Except the US doesn't just burn arabian books, they go ahead and burn the whole arab too!
You can't think of the complexity of a problem in terms of any *specific instance* of that problem. I don't think you're missing anything.  In your last paragraph  you correctly state that *the time it takes to solve a problem is a function of the size of the input* (100+y).  The key concept is that the function for some problems increases faster as the input increases than for other problems (say, finding a minimum value). You're even leading up to the formalism of complexity notation!  When you say "at a maximum" that is what is meant by the O(...) notation (the O means as an upper bound; similarly Ω(...) means as a lower bound, and they're some others).  The constant X you give is also part of the picture and it's used to decide when one function is growing faster than another.
fdsafdsa
they and their commanders and the banks financing this occultic human sacrifice need public trials and public executions
You raise some extremely solid points. There are some cases where you genuinely need the capabilities of an SOA stack, and anything simpler will fail. Having said that, there are many cases where people declare that they are writing "extremely large systems" way too soon in the process. Declaring that you are writing such a system is like admitting defeat on day one. Most of the time, the appropriate solution to a real problem is to start by designing a simple system, then keep it simple as long as possible. Add complexity reluctantly, because you can never take it back out again. I suspect that even Amazon started as a much simpler catalog system (though one with an enormous breadth of data), then gradually added complexity as they tacked on new features. They've reached the point where their pages seem gratuitously complex with all the random micro-features embedded in their pages. Some of the things that are there are absolutely integral, and others are as obscure as some of the items buried in the menus in MS Office. Of course, even if you need a distributed SOA-style system, you still need a strategy for keeping the complexity of that system manageable. A well-thought-out SOA system should make it possible to keep track of all the moving parts for accomplishing something, not remind you of a Rube Goldberg device implemented in software.
this blog was interesting when it was on blogspot, but when they got their own domain, the articles got really annoying.  they would start posts with 'DO YOU SEE IT COMING??? HUH???' really 'angry' writing.  original blog had interesting things like how banks worked, etc.
You're clearly not a critical thinker. Giving same rights to others as you want for yourself would mean that if one wanted to kill people on a whim, he couldn't go wrong in letting others kill people (including the original guy) on a whim.   If you've got half a brain and you want evolution to favour you, you wouldn't want to give others same rights as you take for yourself.
I was hoping for vagina depth.
why?
cops usually don't have bad heart conditions
Cops use weapons.  If they didn't have a taser to use, they would use a billy club.  You have to understand that the job of a cop is not anything above showing you the law.  Yeah...  it is partly showing who is boss.  It is the state. Supposedly, if you are not doing anything wrong, you can surrender and get a fair trial.  The state is in control though.  You're supposed to be the state, not give it a reason.Not everybody has rational reasons either.  Give a break.   
No, they'd start an Internet petition and deliver a letter to their congressperson with printouts indicating that CaptainSnotlicker, Jelloconnoisseur6720 and GottB0nUr4U47904 all disagree with the petition or the action taken against the kid or whatever, and an added note that Jelloconnoisseur6720 wants a gelatin purity law enacted and was gonna write a letter but then saw this petition and decided to add this note and save the postage.
Yeh like when they stage an inside job for the destruction of the twin towers (no plane could have caused them to go down that fast), and not to mention when they fire a missile at the pentagon and pretend a 747 'vaporised'...they were terrorists from the start!!
Or certain drugs, or suicide.
&gt; What? The DVD of Heroes costs about $32 for 23 episodes. Via Apple's retail   &gt; outlet, it costs $46 total. I don't disagree with your general point about pricing.  iTunes is not a bargain hunter's paradise.  However, keep in mind past seasons of TV shows sold on iTunes are sold for around $34.99, more in line with DVD pricing.  More to the point Apple sells seasons as they are run for $1.99 per episode.  This is the real benefit over DVD.  Like buying a single from the music store one can buy one or two missed episode without purchasing a $25.00 DVD set from Amazon 4 or 5 months after the show's season is over.   Handwringing about costs of single episodes in the aggregate is really unnecessary.  Let's say I buy six episodes of various shows over a six to eight month season.  That's $12.00 amortized, around $2.00 a month.  And I don't have to wait to purchase a DVD set for substantially more.   
well yeah. He aced all of his accounting classes to get his 4.0 in bus. admin. didn't he?
Which is exactly the same as the old one BUT ON THE INTERNET
Maybe that would be because the United States doesn't have diplomatic relations with Iran and has absolutely zero influence with the leadership there making government-to-government persuasion impossible.
It's ancient history I know... but... apply current rules to the U.S. Army in 1943-44...  Guten tag, vie gates? What right did the US Army have in storming the African Beaches during Operation Torch?  Why did we have to attack Normandy? The only reason is that FDR wanted in the war against Germany prior to us having a reason - and Japan signing a treaty gave us the reason.  It was the Japanese that attacked us - our war against Hitler was on Paper until we landed, our war on Japan was active! -- In theory it should have been Japan first (not Europe first) but enough power to prevent German transatlantic air attempts. I am not saying we should not have attacked Germany - just saying that getting attacked by Japan makes a piss poor reason to go to war against Germany as a primary objective.
Already posted, but oh well: http://programming.reddit.com/info/2ip5y/comments
WAKE UP SHEEPLE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!VV!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Is it possible NBC said $5 a show to ensure Apple would drop them early and thus they'd be able to distribute the next season of shows wherever they want? As opposed to waiting till December that is, which would be mid season and many people would have bought season passes by then.
&gt;unexpected action That's always welcome on a Friday night.
US military = private mercenaries paid to kill to protect the interests of the warmongers who hire them. vote me down if you think you're not in denial.   
Yeah, I already tried posting it as a bug, but then I realized that the bug site is only for the bete reddit now, and I couldn't replicate the HTML exactly in the comments, and then I saw that it was late, got tired and went to sleep. Meh.
EEWWwwww
Or maybe if you have an artificial limb you use the same gloves on both hands to make it look more normal.
Also, more people think it's real.
glad you liked the movie. ;)
Roof trouble I would believe.
Sheeit, time to give up eating pussy and go back to dippin' Skoal.
How about a nice big slice of chimpeach pie?
eine Gemeinschaft von und für Parkplatzsexbegeisterte/n Damen, Herren und Paaren. eine Themenecke für Gedanken- und Erfahrungsaustausch, eine Bildergalerie, ständig von Usern aktualisierte Treffpunkeliste und für unsere "Wenigschreiber" den Kontaktmarkt... kostenlos...
that's what makes it so funny.
program terminated AFHDU&amp;$ NO CARRIER
So here's a story on reddit about how wrong it is for women to be covered up, meanwhile, I can no longer find pictures on reddit of women who are not covered up (rip nsfw). Make up your minds.
Finishing your novel
So, no one has a sense of humor?
The people who believe this resemble idiots.
Very good 3d audio demo
Well, for one Sweedish is not exactly a friendly language :)
At it again, I see? What will it be tonight? Yahoo News? Some library? Poor miserable bastards.
Not that simple. Yet again, Americans are supporting welfare that gives their wealth to people, some of which are not American citizens. Thus our money is stolen. 
where are you all testing this?
Sure we do. But this woman just bared her heart and soul to us, full of raw and painful emotions. And your attempt to make it into a joke is terribly insensitive.
The fact is that [cars are sold at a completely-unjustifiable huge premium in Canada](http://clevershark.com/?p=1675), and that franchising agreements are designed to protect this sort of customer abuse.
A dog's view of the gay sex scandal rocking the Republican Senator from Idaho, Larry Craig's world.
So what?  That's our culture.  If their cultural norms are above criticism then why aren't ours?
I didn't say that Apple made 4% margin off their sales, or say anything about markup at all.  I said that their business makes 3-5% of its revenue off iTMS (which Apple has said in their own reports).
I think further growth in Phoenix will soon stall, doomed by much higher energy costs and waning water supplies.
Countertops-And-Cabinets.com is dedicated to providing quality information on bathroom, vanity and kitchen countertops and cabinets.
UK still beats shitty old Ireland, most corrupt shithole in Europe. To call the telecomms a 'monopoly' would be an understatement -_-  *on dialup*
The authors have identified a number of trends, including jumping on the Green bandwagon, attempting to indicate ties to Asia, narrowing or expanding of their business, etc.
&gt; No-one wants to talk about things that matter. Well, reddit seems to be a good place to start.   &gt; I do not remember people being like this.  They are hostile, impatient, full of suppressed anger, abrupt, suspicious, and some even threatening. I've always noticed that some people have this sort of demeanor.  Certainly not everyone, though. &gt; No-one wants to complain about anything. People complain quite often, and on reddit we often manage to get some constructive conversation out of it. &gt; And God forbid, do not mention the wars, that topic really gets people uncomfortable. As it should.  War sucks.  It *should* make us all uncomfortable. I would like to belive Leon Fisher, but his article rambles on for *eleven* paragraphs about how angry he is at his passive peers, with **zero evidence to back up his claims**. He complains of high taxes and inflation, none of which has come close to what Germany experienced between the World Wars.  He muses that his countrymen must be closet fascists, "getting off" on dead Iraqis.  He whines about us vegetables being eager to help the governemnt take away our Bill of Rights (despite both the White House and Congress suffering from record-low approval ratings). The real kicker is that Leon ties it all to a new thousand-year Reich in the United States.  Oh really? America has almost *none* of the preconditions Germany suffered from before WWII.  Muslims aren't being forced to wear yellow crescents, the U.S. has not lost territory in a new "Great War," the majority of our country is not soaked in blind nationalism, our money hasn't been printed to 1,000%+ inflation rates, etc., etc., etc. Bush is an imperialist thug - not a totalitarian dictator.  **Comparing Bush to Hitler will not sway the opinions of the people you call vegetables and closet fascists**. And it certainly won't help fix the mess Bush got us into.
Shit shit shit! Where's my zoloft?
read this, he was using commonly accepted code to solicit sex in a public bathroom. http://www.slate.com/id/2173033/nav/ais/
The question is: Where do you get your information? How do you know how much paper work is involved in either case? How do you know what anyone would "rather do"? I have no idea about your opinions, but your comment implies that you know what motivates people, when in reality you don't.
It might be sexist, but I got the impression it was a female as well.
The sad thing is that I thought the article was true. Seeing that it's in theonion.com gave me relief.
I also am not "dis"illioned - however, what they *may* have intended is that the standard press was pulling the wool over everyone's eyes.  I may not agree with certain of his beliefs, but thankfully I agree with him that those beliefs should be left to the states and **NOT** the federal government. Did we abandon the title of "Federal Republic" in 1865?  "The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the States, are reserved for the States respectively, or to the people."  Tenth Amendment to the United States Constitution
Late August. Summer's slow news time. Stories about flying cars and incredible batteries. That will soon be on the market. See you in September.
I do it all the time.  With enthusiasm.
Wait, so you guys really take this seriously?  I completely read this as post-feminist tripe.  Oh well.
All preconceptions aside the look on that guys face just tells me he's in love with that ninja.
Not everything on the internet is "real," if by real they want to say true.
Right now, there are more than 10,000 Native American households in Arizona that have no access to electricity. Shamefully, that's 7% of all Native American households without electricity in America.
You suck at the AdSense.  All I'm going to say.
If by "partisan disillusionment" you mean he's the only candidate who gives **real answers** to questions instead of whatever shit he thinks will play best to the crowd he's speaking to because his handlers have polled different stances.... then yes, you're probably right.
Space is big.
What the fuck is a night club for then?   "Hi, do you fancy me?" should not lead to arrest.  Why?  Because the response can be "I don't swing that way, dude".
Since it is not permitted yet, I hereby declare the US a retarded nation, with issues of human rights and gender equality violation....... YAWN
I don't know, but this resonated with me quite a bit:  &gt;No-one wants to complain about anything. No-one seems to be bothered by high taxes or inflation. They just look at you and roll their eyes like you are crazy if you dare to express your dissatisfaction with the status quo. And God forbid, do not mention the wars, that topic really gets people uncomfortable. It is as if you are asking some personal question. I don't talk to people about politics and economics too much. They act like you've asked about something weird and personal like "Hey, still got that rash I overheard you talking about!?" 
&gt; although it had a kidney, the urinary bladder, the urethra and the intestines.  Just curious. I wonder if any of those would have been*"harvestable"* for transplants, tissue or skin grafts?
You need to look at the growth of the number of solutions that have to be searched. For each extra tumbler the problem is ten times as hard. If you compare this with the travelling salesman problem then when you go from five to six cities there are six times as many combinations to go through. When you go to seven cities it is seven times harder. Notice that here the difficulty scales with the size of the problem you already have, not with some fixed amount (an extra ten combinations on the new tumbler). So, going from 99 to 100 cities the problem is 100 times harder. From 199 to 200 the problem is 200 times as hard. Hopefully you can see that the growth of the problem is increasing faster with the travelling salesman.
just didn't remember any major rivers going through.  Buffalo bayou looked pretty wimpy.
Good point!  If her burqa were transparent we'd all call her a whore.  But of course we're right and the muslims are wrong &lt;sarcasm&gt;.
It doesn't sound like it will be that much more high-*density* than current energy storage is. The main innovation seems to be the speed of charging. Not sure if that would be dangerous or not, but it does seem different.
I haven't bought Apple stuff since the Mac first came out. Steve Wozniak rulez!!
That rocks!  I'm keeping a potato under my seat in the car to protect myself from some road rage nut. And one under my pillow, in case of a nighttime break-in!
I have breasts, Greg, could you milk me?
Not to sound like a schill but ..... **LESS LETHAL** not "non-lethal"  hell, you can kill someone with a styrofoam peanut if you wanted to.
I agree with Amrita. It's just rumours about her
Men's Health / Generic Cialis http://www.skyrxshop.com/?product=cialis 20mg x 10 pills US $ 35.95  20mg x 20 pills US $ 69.95   20mg x 30 pills US $ 89.95  20mg x 60 pills US $ 139.95  20mg x 90 pills US $ 189.95   http://www.skyrxshop.com/?product=cialis 
Sen. Larry Craig’s political career will come to a screeching halt at 10:30 MST at the Boise Train Depot.
It must be real, it must.
